Foreign      Economic Review:  EASTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 015, Date 
12 April, 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a subtitled series 
published by FBIS Europe/Latin America Group.  The Survey series 
features brief summaries of foreign media reports on topical issues 
compiled from the most recent sources available to FBIS.  Any and 
all comment or analysis contained herein is attributable to the 
cited media source. 

   Europe Economic Review is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY 
published by the East and West Europe Divisions of Europe/Latin 
America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas bureaus.  Europe 
Economic Review is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Reports for West and East Europe 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear as full-text translations in other FBIS publications. 

   The contents of Europe Economic Review consist of abstracts of 
foreign media coverage of European economic developments under two 
main geographic headings: 

   -- Western Europe:  Drawing on West European, Canadian, and 
Turkish media, this section reports on national and regional 
economic issues, focusing on economic competitiveness, key 
industries, regional economic integration, internal economic 
policies and performance, and foreign trade and investment. 

   -- Eastern Europe:  Citing East European and, where appropriate, 
other foreign media sources, this section highlights East European 
efforts to rebuild national economies and achieve integration into 
the European Community and the global economy, focusing on policy 
debates and practical action geared toward the implementation of 
internal economic reforms and industrial restructuring and on 
developments in foreign trade, cooperation, and investment from 
national and regional perspectives. 

   Under these two main headings, summaries of foreign media reports 
on all categories of economic issues generally are grouped under 
subheadings by subject, country, or region. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government. 

   ALBANIA 

   SCOTTISH GROUP FUNDS RESTORATION OF TIRANA CLINIC:  The work for 
the restoration of the Tirana Outpatient Clinic No. 1 will start 
soon.  The project will be financed by the Albanian Humanitarian 
Society in Edinburgh, Scotland.  Reconstruction and facilities for 
this medical center, expected to be completed on 2O April, will meet 
European contemporary standards.  (Tirana ATA in English 1135 GMT 17 
Mar 94 AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES PROPERTY TAX BILL:  On 16 March, the People's 
Assembly approved the bill on property tax in the Republic of 
Albania.  The bill anticipates taxes over agricultural land and 
buildings.  The incomes levied by the taxes on agricultural lands 
will be divided in acceptable proportions between central and local 
governments.  The bill anticipates that 70 percent of these incomes 
will be available to the local government, implying that local 
governments will have all the opportunities to have a local budget 
as well as enough funds to finance their expenses.  The tax on 
agricultural lands is also considered as a measure that will make 
the peasants work their land because the tax will be on the land and 
not on the production.  The tax on buildings is annual and different 
according to the kind of the building.  Two chapters of former bill 
were omitted, the tax on cattle and on unoccupied sites, which both 
can be subject to other bills. (Tirana ATA in English 0924 GMT 17 
Mar 94 AU) 

   OCCIDENTAL PETROLEUM STARTS DRILLING IN ADRIATIC:  An Occidental 
Petroleum affiliate recently started drilling operations for oil and 
natural gas research in the No. 3 block of the Adriatic Sea.  The 
"Drill Mar 1" sea platform is installed 35 kilometers off the 
Albanian seacoast.  Some 75 workers and specialists from the U.S., 
Britain, Italy, Spain, and Albania will work 90 days running two 
shifts 12 hours each.  Seismical, geological and geophysical 
research has been carried out before the drilling in 4,500 meters, 
which will cost $12 million.  According to company's experts, the 
research work has been of a good level but the result is expected 
after drilling in the sea will be over.  This is the third drilling 
in the No. 3 block after the first two previous drilling by the Agip 
Company.  (Tirana ATA in English 1112 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   ELBASAN ELECTRIC NETWORK OVERLOADED:  Some 28 new electric cabins 
were commissioned and two new station-feeders were set up during 
this winter in Elbasan District.  However, the electric network is 
still operating under an average of 110-115 percent of the installed 
power, which technically speaking should not exceed 90 percent. 
Leakage in the electric network due to abuse with electricity are 
worth great amounts of money.  Losses account for about 60 percent 
in January, although the electric police have imposed fines of 
700,000 leks on several citizens and private subjects.  Demir Hoxha, 
the Electric Enterprise director, told ATA that although winter is 
going, consequences in the electric network are numerous.  Thus, 17 
transformers and two electric cabins are out of use and there are 
damages in 3.1 km of high tension cables, 2.2 km of electric lines, 
and in 1.6 electric poles.  (Tirana ATA in English 1129 GMT 18 Mar 
94 AU) 

   CHAMBER OF COMMERCE JOINS WORLD BODY:  The Chamber of Commerce 
and Industry of Albania became a member of the World Chamber of 
Commerce with headquarters in Paris.  Mr. Zhan Charles Ruhe, general 
secretary of this organization, declared this decision in an 
executive board meeting held in Brussels on 19 March.  The World 
Chamber of Commerce will provide support to the Albanian businessmen 
and the Chamber of Commerce and Industry, thus influencing in fully 
structuring the market economy in Albania.  (Tirana ATA in English 
1106 GMT 19 Mar 94 AU) 
   ITALIAN FIRM TO BUILD TOURIST FACILITY IN KAVAJE:  The Territory 
Adjustment Council in Kavaje District recently approved the creation 
of the first tourist village that will be located in Golemi beach. 
The Italian "Babin Canton SPA" company will carry out the project, 
providing 600 beds, cultural and sport equipment, and other tourist 
facilities for the village, worth $1.2 million.  The construction of 
the village will be carried out in two stages.  The first stage will 
be over in 1995.  (Tirana ATA in English 1107 GMT 19 Mar 94 AU) 

   SELENICE BITUMEN MINE TO BE CLOSED:  Regarding some concerns by 
the Independent Trade Union of the Selenice Bitumen Mine, the State 
Control Service carried out a check-up and reported that the mine 
will soon be closed.  Out of six sectors that functioned three years 
ago, only one sector is presently operating in the mine.  The 
investigation results confirmed that many things had been stolen and 
the mine had continued to pay workers who were employed in Greece. 
The mine's trade union blamed the enterprise administration that had 
remained the same since 1990.  Under the pretext of the reform, the 
administration had appointed incapable persons as chiefs of sectors 
and shifts.  The small town of Selenice has been economically 
connected with the Bitumen Mine, which has been exploited since 
ancient times for the high quality of the bitumen.  The mine was 
being exploited during '20s and '30s by foreign firms.  A lot of 
European roads have been laid with the Selenice bitumen.  (Tirana 
ATA in English 1303 GMT 19 Mar 94 AU) 

   ITALIAN-ALBANIAN JOINT VENTURE TO BUILD HIGHWAY:  The Italo- 
Albanian joint venture "Infro-Projekt-Konsultim" had taken the 
responsibility of constructing the first Albanian highway that will 
pass through Durres-Elbasan-Qafe Thane.  According to the project, 
this highway will be part of the Pan-European Network.  Veip Guri, 
president of this joint venture, informed ATA that some potential 
banks and enterprises will finance the implementation of this 
project.  (Tirana ATA in English 1112 GMT 20 Mar 94 AU) 

   NEW ANALYSIS LABORATORY IN TIRANA:  A new contemporary analysis 
laboratory will soon start activity in Tirana. The well known "DY 
PO" enterprise headed by Greek investor Fotis Sarantopolos will 
invest in the laboratory.  In a TV interview, he said that the goal 
of coming to Albania was twofold.  First, as an investment 
enterprise we would like to have relations with a neighboring 
country like Albania, and second, we heartily would like to help the 
Albanian people to better solve their health problems.  We sincerely 
want to help hospitals in Albania, and for this we have put the most 
contemporary equipments at their disposal.  He also stated that 
besides this laboratory in Tirana, he hopes to set up others in 
various parts of Albania.  (Tirana ATA in English 1115 GMT 20 Mar 94 
AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES 1994 STATE BUDGET BILL:  In a 19 March session, 
the People's Assembly discussed the bill on state budget draft for 
1994 presented by the Meksi cabinet.  The deputies mentioned two 
essential elements of the state budget for 1994: first the fact that 
the expenses for social support will be increased by 45 percent, 
covering 30 percent of the total expenses out of 25 percent last 
year.  The second was the increase of public investments.  Their 
program raises by 15 percent for 1994, covering about 8.5 percent of 
the total expenses.  The deputies stressed that the budget draft is 
a program indicating all good efforts to build a market economy and 
a legal state.  After remarks and proposals by parliamentary 
commissions and deputies, the bill on state budget for 1994 was 
approved in principle, article by article, and by a majority of 
votes.  (Tirana ATA in English 0933 GMT 20 Mar 94 AU) 

   CASH REGISTERS TO BE INSTALLED IN SHOPS:  Luan Pustina, head of 
the Tax Branch at Tirana Municipality, confirms that cash registers 
are being installed in retail sale shops, bars, food stores, and 
restaurants in Tirana.  Pustina said that from now on, 50 cash 
registers will be installed each day in Tirana.  Some 4,000 cash 
registers are foreseen to be installed in Tirana so as to have an 
evidence of sale figures registered in the shops, which should be 
subject to taxes.  The cash registers are expected to be paid in two 
months by private companies.  The cash registers will be soon 
installed in other cities of Albania. (Tirana ATA in English 0911 
GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   INCREASE IN PRICES OF CONSUMER GOODS:  Recent statistics from the 
Statistics Institute confirm that the index of the prices of 
consumer goods during January 1994 increased by 2.02 percent as 
compared with December 1993.  In February, this index had an 
increase of 1.70 percent as against January.  (Tirana ATA in English 
1119 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   IMPORTED FOODSTUFFS DECLARED 'INADEQUATE':  Recently the Quality 
and Standards Branch in Sarande declared inadequate a considerable 
amount of flour provided by a Greek private company and 8 tons of 
cooking oil containing acetic acid.  The branch is more and more 
conducting chemical and physical tests for food items either 
produced in Albania or imported.  Kristaq Idrizi, head of the 
branch, told ATA that as of January this year, the branch has 
carried out 60 tests for products, such as flour for private 
bakeries, oil, beer, alcoholic drinks, etc.  (Tirana ATA in English 
1120 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   CABINET ADOPTS BILLS, AMENDMENTS TO LAWS, AGREEMENTS: At its 
meeting, the Albanian Government approved a bill on construction, 
maintenance, administration, and exploitation of the irrigation and 
drainage structures, as well as a bill on pastures. Both bills will 
soon be presented to the People's Assembly for approval.  The 
government also discussed and approved supplements and amendments to 
the Law on Privatization of State House Units.  At the same time, 
the government approved an amendment to the Law on Customs Tariffs, 
which is related to the export taxes.  The Albanian Government 
approved in principle the draft agreements for promotion and 
protection of investments between the Governments of the Republic of 
Albania and the United Kingdom and between Governments of the 
Republics of Albania and Romania.  The government also approved a 
trade agreement with Malaysia and an agreement for scientific and 
technological cooperation with the Government of the former Yugoslav 
Republic of Macedonia (FYROM).  At today's meeting, the Albanian 
Government approved some amendments to its previous decisions. 
(Tirana ATA in English 0913 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT FIXES SUGAR, OIL PRICES:  The Albanian Government has 
established a fixed retail price for sugar at 60 leks per kilogram. 
All tradesmen will be required to sell sugar at this price, 
effective immediately.  The government has also decided to revise 
its position on prices of oil and oil-based products.  Based on the 
new decision, prices for 70-85 octane gasoline will be fixed and 
will take effect on 1 June this year.  New prices will also be 
established for all other petroleum products.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1156 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   ALBANIAN-ITALIAN CLOTHING JOINT VENTURE:  A new Albanian-Italian 
joint venture for the production of ready-made clothes was recently 
established in Lushnje.  The Albanian party will contribute 30 
percent of the capital, the Italians 70 percent.  The initial number 
of workers is 40, but in the near future 50 female employees will be 
added to the staff.  To start with, the enterprise will produce 
shirts for all ages, later on it will make parkas, trousers, and 
other clothes.  The venture's owners and workers are confident that 
their fashions will be successful both in local and foreign markets. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1310 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   LACK OF DATA ON FOREIGN INVESTMENT:  Mr. Selami Xhepa, director 
of the Foreign Investment Encouragement Center, states that "foreign 
investment in all sectors of the Albanian economy is higher than is 
generally thought, but the exact amount cannot be verified for lack 
of data."  Mr. Xhepa stressed that some 150 joint ventures are in 
business in Albania.  The foreign capital share of total investment 
amounts to approximately $150 million.  Some 49 private enterprises 
began operations in 1993.  Foreign investment is focused mainly on 
construction and light industry, agriculture, fishing, and 
transportation.  Mr. Xhepa says that the most profitable sectors for 
foreign investors in Albania are tourism, light industry, and 
agriculture.  The recent Law on Foreign Investment is designed to 
eliminate bureaucratic impediments to the investment process. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1142 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES LAW ON CHAMBER OF COMMERCE, INDUSTRY: 
Parliament has approved a new law on the Chamber of Commerce and 
Industry, which was introduced several months ago and amended prior 
to being passed.  The new law aims to improve the way the chamber 
works and expand its territorial coverage and membership.  The main 
goal of the Chamber of Commerce and Industry will be to accelerate 
commercial activity through continuous training of new Albanian 
businessmen, familiarizing them with commercial legislation, customs 
taxes and tariffs, international trade regulations, purchase prices, 
and other business matters.  (Tirana ATA in English 1125 GMT 11 Mar 
94 AU) 

   BANK GOVERNOR BRIEFS ASSEMBLY ON FOREIGN DEBT NEGOTIATIONS:  On 
10 March, Dylber Vrioni, governor of the Bank of Albania, testified 
to the People's Assembly about the work of the Foreign Debt State 
Commission and the future strategy to be followed in resolving debt 
problems.  Mr. Vrioni said that in April 1992 Albania's foreign debt 
was about $405 million.  This debt was created by communist 
governments during 1988-1991.  The debts incurred during this period 
were not used to finance investment but to buy consumer goods so as 
to create the impression that everything was going well.  In 
February this year, the debt amounted to $480 million.  The 
difference reflects the interest charges.  About one-fifth of the 
debt is to foreign governments and is in the process of being 
resolved.  The final agreements with the countries concerned are 
under way.  Last Monday, the debt with Austria was resolved, and 
agreements will soon be signed with the Netherlands, Germany, 
France, and Italy. 

   Vrioni stated that the debt to private lenders appears to be more 
complicated.  Besides the Paris Club, we have held talks with 10 
main foreign private banks, discussing their claims and the forms of 
negotiation to be followed in finding a solution.  Mr. Vrioni said 
that we would like to give a signal to the international community 
that we need their financial support, promising at the same time 
that we shall observe all obligations stemming from this support. 
Since 1992, Albania has systematically paid off its debts resulting 
from the international community's support for the economic reforms. 
Deputies expressed their concern over the increase in the foreign 
debt and urged the devising of a strategy to help with its 
negotiation.  (Tirana ATA in English 1136 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   TIRANA BEER FACTORY RESUMES PRODUCTION:  After a pause of nearly 
three years, the Beer Factory in Tirana, with the longest tradition 
in country, resumed its production.  The European Union provided 1 
million ECU for the ingredients.  In 1993, the Albanian Government 
provided 4.2 million leks to repair the equipment and a further 7 
million this year.  Bashkim Bregu, the factory's director, stated 
that during the first 10 days of April, it will produce large 
quantities of beer.  The wholesale price for one bottle of beer will 
be 2.2 leks, while the retail price will be 26-27 leks.  What 
worries the specialists and managers of the Beer Factory whether 
Albanian beer will be able to compete with the imported variety.  At 
present the Albanian market is dominated by well known brands such 
as Kronenburg, Kruna, Moretti, and others because of the highly 
effective advertising in the press, and on radio and television. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1122 GMT 13 Mar 94 AU) 

   JOINT VENTURE WITH ITALIAN FIRM ESTABLISHED IN ELBASAN:  A joint 
venture established by the Oil-Soap Enterprise in Elbasan and IDI of 
Pisa in Italy started work in January this year.  Besides cooking 
oil and soap, the joint venture will also produce detergents.  On 
the basis of the agreement, the Albanian side has provided the plant 
and machinery and 116 workers, while the Italian side has projected 
an investment of $145,000 mainly for new equipment.  The Albanian 
director, Muhamet Avllazagai, told ATA that the production of 
detergents both for the domestic and foreign markets will start in 
April.  The production capacity will be 2.3 tons in eight hours. 
Assembly lines for the production of plastic bottles anmd oil 
bottling is expected to be set up in the future.  With investment to 
be in two stages, continuous work will be guaranteed to the workers, 
whose average monthly salary ranges from 7,000-9,000 leks.  They 
will also receive extra payments for additional production in a six- 
month period.  (Tirana ATA in English 1111 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   HIGHER SALARIES FOR JUDICIARY EMPLOYEES:  The People's Assembly 
adopted a new law providing significantly higher salaries for 
judicial officials.  Members of the Constitutional Court and the 
Court of Appeals, judges, assistant judges, and investigators will 
profit from this law.  Considering the difficult nature of their 
work, such as pressure from delicate criminal cases, work in 
isolation, and overtime hours including weekends, the attorneys and 
investigators will be paid higher salaries than employees in 
legislative and executive branches.  The salaries of civil attorneys 
and investigators will be equal to those in the military.  The bill 
envisages an extra clothing allowance for district attorneys and 
investigators.  (Tirana ATA in English 1115 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   GERMAN FINANCING FOR ALBANIAN PROJECTS:  The Albanian Embassy in 
Bonn reports that an agreement to finance projects in the dispatch 
of goods and the construction of aqueducts in Albania was signed in 
Frankfurt on 3 March 1994.  The agreement was signed between the 
German Bank Kreditanstalt Fuer Wiederaufbau (KfW) (Reconstruction 
Loan Association) represented by Manfred Mueller, former state 
secretary and Kreditanstalt Presidency member, and the Albanian 
Bank, represented by Dylber Vrioni, Albanian Bank governor.  Mr. 
Mueller expressed his pleasure for the developments so far in the 
field of delivery of financial means by the German side.  He said 
that the bank he represents will support the Albanian Government's 
commitment for an efficient use of the German aid.  Mr. Mueller said 
he will further help to perfect the banking system in Albania. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1114 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   PUBLIC MANAGEMENT, ADMINISTRATION INSTITUTE:  The Public 
Management and Administration Institute was inaugurated in the 
presence of Prime Minister Meksi in Tirana on 4 March.  The 
institute will train management specialists for private and state 
sectors and help them stay abreast of contemporary methods and 
practices.  The institution is financed by the UNDP (United Nations 
Development Program) with an initial contribution of $600,000. 
These funds will be used to train new private sector managers with 
contemporary concepts.  Prime Minister Aleksander Meksi voiced the 
government's support to this important institution.  The first 
courses at the institute will begin during the second week of March. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1347 GMT 5 Mar 94 AU) 
   SHKODER URBAN DEVELOPMENT PROJECT:  The Rural Development 
Foundation this month will begin to implement the project on urban 
development of Shkoder City in the framework of a new initiative by 
the World Bank.  The Rural Development Foundation Director Genc Juka 
and Shkoder Mayor Filip Guraziu signed an agreement on 5 March.  Mr. 
Juka told ATA that after the completion of the Shkoder project, the 
foundation will continue its work for the rural development of this 
district.  This is the second year that this foundation has been 
carrying out its activity in Albania.  During the past year, it 
realised a pilot project, while this year the foundation will carry 
out its normal activity.  Among the foundation projects, we can 
mention the assistance to other districts in northeastern Albania. 
This year, the World Bank will put approximately $8 million at the 
foundation's disposal.  The World Bank's new initiative is expected 
to amount to $200,000.  According to the agreement, the tender will 
be over by 15 March.  The private firm that will win the tender is 
expected to start work on the project in March.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 0924 GMT 6 Mar 94) 

   PROTOCOL ON MILITARY MEDICAL COOPERATION WITH TURKEY:  The 
Albanian Embassy in Ankara reports that a protocol between the 
Republics of Albania and Turkey on the qualification of military 
medical staff was signed in Ankara on 8 March.  The protocol was 
signed in the context of the agreement for military cooperation and 
qualification signed on 19 November 1992.  The agreement will 
establish cooperation in the field of military medicine.  For the 
Turkish side, the protocol was signed by General Sherif Sabunju 
(name as received), while for the Albanian side by the ambassador in 
Ankara, Skender Shkupi.  (Tirana ATA in English 1108 GMT 9 Mar 94 
AU) 

   BULGARIA 

   JOINT VENTURE TO BUILD TOBACCO FACTORY IN UKRAINE:  A Bulgarian- 
Ukrainian joint venture was registered in Poltava, Ukraine, to 
construct a tobacco plant there.  The Blagoevgrad Tobacco Processing 
Works holds a 70-percent stake in the joint venture.  Construction 
work has already started, and the plant equipment will be delivered 
within the next few weeks.  Bulgartabak hopes to regain a firm 
position in its traditional markets in the former Soviet republics 
by the export of cigarette production to the CIS countries.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1826 GMT 20 Mar 94 AU) 

   BREWERY MANAGERS URGE MASS PRIVATIZATION:  A letter from the 
chief executive officers of 19 breweries to parliament, the Council 
of Ministers, and the Ministries of Industry and Finance calls for 
the urgent mass privatization of breweries across the country. 
According to the brewery chiefs, upgrading of the breweries' 
equipment will cost about $150 million, which can only be secured 
through a speedy privatization, in which the units in this sector 
will compete for attracting foreign investments.  The breweries in 
Stara Zagora, Khaskovo, Burgas, Ruse, Sofia, and Pazardzhik have 
already been put up for privatization.  (Sofia BTA in English 1826 
GMT 20 Mar 94 AU) 

   NEW ELECTRIC POWER LINE TO FYROM COMPLETED:  Construction has 
been completed of a 110-kilovolt electric power line connecting the 
Republic of Bulgaria with the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia 
(FYROM) under an the agreement signed between the National 
Electricity Company of Bulgaria and the Macedonian Ministry of 
Economics.  The power line is 60 km long.  Its construction, which 
began last year, was facilitated by a $20 million credit granted by 
Bulgaria to the Macedonian Government.  At present, negotiations are 
under way on constructing a 400-kilovolt power line that will also 
extend to other Balkan states.  (Sofia DUMA in Bulgarian 16 Mar 94 p 
1 AU) 
   SOFIA FACES WATER SHORTAGE:  Sofia's water supply is in a 
critical condition, the Public Committee for Improving Sofia's Water 
Supply announced at a news conference on 21 March.  The content of 
the Iskur Dam (Sofia's main water source) is 95 million cubic meters 
(cu.m) and its critical volume is 90 million cu.m.  Its designed 
volume is 670 million cu.m, but the dam has rarely been full since 
it was built.  The water level of the dam has been on decline ever 
since 1982.  Early in January the Sofia City Council introduced 
water rationing in some areas of the capital.  There was some talk 
of rationing Sofia's water supply as a whole, but the government 
decided to restrict water consumption by industrial users only. 

   Sofia's water supply problem is not a new one.  Some four years 
ago a project was proposed to construct a water supply pipeline 
system from the Rila mountain catchment area.  However, in 1989 and 
1990 leaders and followers of various environmental parties and 
movements staged mass protests against the project, claiming its 
effect on the Mount Rila eco-system would be disastrous, and a 
parliamentary commission decided to suspend the project.  Sofia's 
water supply problem was resolved by rechanneling water from the 
Belmeken-Sestrimo cascade chain to it.  A new water supply project 
for catching the waters of Mount Rila has been developed, the new 
conference was told by Gancho Khitrov, chairman of the Public 
Committee for Improving Sofia's Water Supply.  It meets all 
ecological requirements, Khitrov said.  (Sofia BTA in English 1913 
GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   TRANSPORT MINISTRY ORDERS AIRCRAFT SAFETY CHECKS:  At a Transport 
Ministry meeting on 21 March, Deputy Minister of Transport Pencho 
Penchev reported that accidents with Bulgarian aircraft operated by 
various Bulgarian airlines had become more frequent of late, though 
luckily involving no casualties.  The Ministry's leadership decided 
to carry out an urgent technical inspection of the aircraft fleet, 
its airworthiness, and operation.  Similar checkups will be 
conducted on the railways and road transport.  Transport Minister 
Kiril Ermenkov assigned the Railway Transport Department to check, 
jointly with the Bulgarian State Railways, reports the concentration 
of tank cars carrying fuel in different places in the country and in 
Somovit on the Danube in particular, where 40 tank cars are now 
standing whose owners have not been identified.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1946 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   RUSSIAN, BULGARIAN BANKERS AGREE ON PAYMENTS:  The Sofia press 
reported on 17 March that bankers had agreed in Moscow to effect 
payments between Bulgaria and Russia in national currencies.  The 
agreement will take force after approval by the two countries' 
national banks.  Russian companies will be able to open lev accounts 
in Bulgarian banks and Bulgarian companies -- ruble accounts in 
Russian banks.  The two sides will pay one another at market rates 
set by the commercial banks.  This would allow Bulgarian firms to 
buy and export strategic raw materials such as oil, which has so far 
been done in dollars, STANDART NEWS reported. (Sofia BTA in English 
1027 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   LEV CONTINUES FALL AGAINST DOLLAR:  The dollar gained a further 
two leva on 16 March, shaking the interbank market.  Dollars sold at 
46.80 leva during most of the day, topping 47 leva in late day 
trading, which was attributed to big demand from power importers 
such as the National Electricity Company and Neftokhim, dealers were 
quoted as saying.  The Bulgarian National Bank (BNB) had agreed to 
sell them dollars from its foreign currency reserves but failed to 
meet its commitment, forcing them out on the market.  Despite the 
dollar gain, the BNB bank did not intervene in the market.  Dealers 
predict that unless the BNB acts urgently, the dollar will hit 50 
leva. (Sofia BTA in English 1027 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   VIETNAM TO REPAY LOANS WITH COMMODITIES:  In 1994 Vietnam plans 
to export to Bulgaria coffee, rubber, and rice to partly repay loans 
arrears for work completed on coffee and rubber plantations, TRUD 
reported on 17 March, citing Trade Ministry sources.  Vietnam will 
also export bamboo articles and furniture, art objects and ceramics, 
sports equipment, and tea.  (Sofia BTA in English 1027 GMT 17 Mar 94 
AU) 

   MORE TRAINING CHANCES FOR UNEMPLOYED:  Many unemployed will be 
given an opportunity for training and retraining, Deputy Minister of 
Labor And Social Affairs Yordan Khristoskov, head of the National 
Employment Office, announced on 17 March at a national conference in 
Varna of directors of regional employment centers on retraining 
problems.  At the end of last year, it was said, the Training and 
Unemployment Fund had accumulated reserves of 3.2 billion leva and 
is now expecting 6.5 billion in receipts.  The fund will help 
finance the retraining of personnel for companies about to be 
restructured.  It can also finance nationwide and regional training 
programs for the unemployed and offers information and professional 
advice on starting private business.  According to the National 
Employment Office's bulletin, there were 623,980 jobless in Bulgaria 
in February, 8,007 less than in January.  Of these, 203,924 have 
received unemployment and welfare benefits.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1854 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIVATIZATION AGENCY PUBLISHES ANNUAL REPORT:  The press on 18 
March carries figures from the annual report of the Privatization 
Agency.  The proceeds from privatization deals completed in 1993 
were 1.227 billion leva.  Sales totalled 1,203,655,250 leva and 
privatized establishments' settled debts amounted to 23.029 million 
leva.  Employees of the privatized establishments bought shares 
valued at 51.927 million leva.  (Sofia BTA in English 1036 GMT 18 
Mar 94 AU) 

   ENERGY PRICES TO INCREASE:  On 10 March the National Council for 
Trilateral Cooperation held a session at which it decided on 
increases in energy prices for domestic and industrial consumers as 
of 1 April.  Electricity prices will rise by 29 percent for domestic 
consumers, while thermal energy will cost 90 percent more.  For 
industrial uses, the costs of electric power are increased by 39 
percent as of 15 March, and thermal power will rise in price by 43 
percent as of 1 April.  From the same date, fuel briquettes will be 
on average 40 percent more expensive.  The council also approved 
measures for periodically updating energy prices in line with 
inflation, together with compensation for persons with low incomes. 
The proposed new prices will probably be submitted to the Council of 
Ministers next week.  (Sofia Khorizont Radio Network in Bulgarian 
1700 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   CIS NATURAL GAS MORE EXPENSIVE:  The price of natural gas 
imported from Russia and Ukraine has gone up by 70 percent since the 
beginning of this year, the BTA Vratsa correspondent reported.  The 
rise in the price of natural gas, which is the main raw material at 
Khimco Inc., increases production costs.  Khimco managers are 
insisting on changes in the price formation of their output to 
preserve its competitiveness and their export potentials.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1945 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   BALKANAIR MAY DISCONTINUE DOMESTIC SERVICES:  If the 
privatization of Balkan Bulgarian Airlines (Balkanair) is delayed, 
it will have to discontinue its domestic services, the company's 
boss, Kostadin Botev, said, quoted by 24 CHASA on 11 March.  In 
addition, Balkanair will have to cancel its 70 charter flights. 
Botev says this drastic measure is prompted by the carrier's 
snowballing losses.  A private airline and a private bank are ready 
to share in Balkanair's privatization, the daily writes.  So far 62 
foreign airlines and 43 investors have declined to participate. 
Bulgarian banks, however, are showing interest in Balkanair's 
denationalization, 24 CHASA specifies.  The European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development declared that it will finance the 
deal only on condition that the investment stay in the 
denationalized unit, which is inadmissible under Bulgaria's 
Privatization Act, the daily writes.  In late March the National 
Assembly Transport and Economic Committees will decide whether to 
sell Balkanair to the buyers who have stepped forward so far or 
whether to seek new ones.  (Sofia BTA in English 1735 GMT 11 Mar 94 
AU) 

   BUSINESS PROMOTION IN GERMANY:  Bulgarian-German economy days 
will be held in Duisburg from 15-18 March under an agreement with 
the Association of German Chambers of Commerce and Industry, a news 
conference was told on 11 March by Bozhidar Bozhinov, president of 
the Bulgarian Chamber of Commerce and Industry.  Bulgaria will be 
represented by 44 companies, and Germany by 86, including a 
Bulgarian-German joint venture.  In 1993, trade turnover between 
Germany and Bulgaria exceeded 20 billion leva, with Bulgaria 
exporting goods worth 6.8 billion leva against imports from Germany 
valued at 13.4 billion leva.  (Sofia BTA in English 1952 GMT 11 Mar 
94 AU) 

   EXPORT OPPORTUNITIES IN KAZAKHSTAN:  Kazakhstan is interested in 
buying tobacco from Bulgaria, but the tobacco goods production there 
is not on a very high level.  It is good for Bulgaria to develop 
investment projects for the improvement of tobacco goods production 
in the form of technology and equipment and offer them to 
Kazakhstan, Zakhari Zakhariev, chairman of the Federation for 
Friendship with CIS Countries, told a news conference on 11 March. 
Bulgaria can also supply to Kazakhstan foods, wine, strong drinks 
and light industry products; there are opportunities for cooperation 
in metallurgy and the petroleum industry, he said.  Days of Bulgaria 
are planned to be held in that country in April.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1952 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   CONSUMER PRICES INDEX RISES:  The February consumer price index 
stood at 104.6, the National Statistical Institute reported on 14 
March.  The price rises in February were as follows:  foods 5.79 
percent, non-foods 3.98 percent, and services 1.14 percent.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1914 GMT 14 Mar 94 AU) 

   NATURAL GAS FOUND OFFSHORE NEAR VARNA:  Natural gas has been 
discovered close to Cape Emine near Varna by the Ocean Liberator 
drilling rig, 24 CHASA reported on 15 March.  This was announced by 
an independent expert monitoring the drill.  According to him, it is 
as yet unknown whether the deposit is of any commercial value.  The 
rig drilled to a depth of 4,000 meters.  (Sofia BTA in English 0906 
GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   KREMIKOVTSI PLANT STARTS UP THIRD BLAST FURNACE:  Following a 
major overhaul, today the Kremikovtsi Metallurgical Plant near Sofia 
commissioned its third blast furnace.  The installation has been 
fitted with new mechanical equipment and an electronic system for 
controlling the technological process.  The furnace is also fitted 
with apparatus for cleaning the gases discharged into the 
atmosphere.  The reconstruction work cost about 1 billion leva. 
(Sofia Khorizont Radio Network in Bulgarian 1300 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   NO PLANS TO LIFT GRAIN EXPORTS BAN:  There are no plans to lift 
the ban on cereals exports any time soon, Radko Petrunov, head of 
the Processing Industry, Balances, Standardization and Metrology 
Department of the Agriculture Ministry, told reporters on 15 March. 
Wheat is barred from export until 30 June, and maize until 30 
September 1994.  The export of surplus flour may be allowed.  This 
surplus amounted to some 30,000 tons at the start of the year and is 
expected to be the same at the end of April, Petrunov said.  The 
Grain State Fund will regulate the grain production and market 
according to a grain production concept adopted by the Ministry's 
collegium on 15 March.  (Sofia BTA in English 2026 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   CONSULTANTS BEING SELECTED FOR SOFIA AIRPORT CONSTRUCTION:  On 15 
March a board of experts of the Transport Ministry today shortlisted 
five companies, three of which will be awarded consultancy contracts 
for the Sofia Airport project.  The project was developed by the 
British firm of Halcrow.  Sofia Airport Director General Khristo 
Danchev will study the opportunities for financing the consultancy 
through the Airport Operators Council International (AOCI).  (Sofia 
BTA in English 2026 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   AGREEMENT ON VAT EXEMPTION FOR NEWSPAPERS:  At a meeting on 15 
March six editors in chief of major dailies, representatives of four 
parliamentary forces, Parliament Chairman Aleksandur Yordanov, and 
Finance Minister Stoyan Aleksandrov came to an agreement that 
newspapers, magazines, and books would be exempted from value-added 
tax (VAT).  Aleksandrov pointed out that VAT will still be collected 
on advertisements in newspapers, magazines and books.  This week the 
parliamentary Economic Committee and Budgetary Committee are to 
discuss two bills of amendments to the Value Added Tax Act, which 
was passed on October 1, 1993 and comes into force on April 1, 1994. 
The proposed amendments provide for the exemption of newspapers from 
VAT.  (Sofia BTA in English 1852 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   REOPENING OF GOLD MINE URGED:  The Madzharovo mine can produce at 
least one ton of gold and 10 tons of silver per year for the state 
if ore extraction and processing starts immediately, that is, if the 
Ministry of Industry allows the establishment of a Bulgarian- 
Australian joint venture, 24 CHASA and TRUD report on 16 March, 
quoting Yordan Yordanov, the manager of the Madzharov Company.  Only 
six of the 150 lodes have been studied, but that is enough to start 
work, TRUD writes.  If things go well, the planned initial 
investment of $2.4 million for evaluation projects will rise to $30 
million.  A modern hydrometallurgical plant will be built if the 
mine proves profitable.  The Bulgarian state will hold 49 percent of 
the shares in the joint venture, Eurost Mineral Development NL 
(Australia) -- 31 percent, and Balkan Mining Consulting Ltd.  (Great 
Britain) -- 20 percent. 

   Industrial gold mining might be the only solution for at least 
100,000 Bulgarian miners, it is claimed in an article published in 
24 CHASA on precious metal deposits.  "The rest is all too clear: 
Uranium and lead equal suicide, coal mining is poorly paid, and 
copper and zinc production are close to extinction," the article 
points out.  There are gold and silver deposits in the eastern 
Rhodopes (southern Bulgaria) and near Khaskovo, Kurdzhali, 
Topolovgrad, and Momchilgrad.  (Sofia BTA in English 1157 GMT 16 Mar 
94 AU) 

   BALKAN TRADE CHAMBER PLANNED:  The Bulgarian Chamber of Commerce 
and Industry is expected to draw up a project for an Association of 
the Balkan Chambers of Commerce and Industry within a month, 
national radio reported.  At the first meeting on 2 March, the 
chairmen of the chambers of the Balkan countries decided to approve 
the project at the next meeting in Romania in September.  To 
facilitate Balkan business contacts, the chambers will link up their 
information systems.  Meetings will be held semi-annually and the 
hosts will be rotated.  The first meeting, organized at the 
initiative of the Bulgarian Chamber, was attended by representatives 
of Greece, Turkey, Albania, Macedonia, Serbia, Slovenia, and 
Romania.  (Sofia BTA in English 1517 GMT 6 Mar 94 AU) 

   'MULTIGROUP' HOLDING COMPANY:  Multigroup Inc. comprises between 
80 and 100 companies, Chief Secretary Boyko Draganov said.  Over 50 
enterprises form the group's production and trade division. 
Multigroup prefers processing industries that need heavy financing. 
The holding company has set up enterprises to produce dried fruit, 
contact lenses, rubber seals, and alcohol from molasses.  Its first 
large investment in this country is the purchase of the sugar 
refinery in Kameno (Southeastern Bulgaria).  In 1993 Multigroup 
invested $50 million in Bulgaria.  It has subsidiaries and offices 
in Vienna, the state of Virginia, Moscow, Almaty (Kazakhstan), 
Ukraine, China, South Africa, and Paraguay.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1517 GMT 6 Mar 94 AU) 

   FINANCING FOR SILISTRA-CALARASI FERRY SECURED:  A contract has 
been approved for the financing, building, and operation of a ferry 
between the Danubian cities of Silistra (in Bulgaria) and Calarasi 
(Romania).  (Sofia BTA in English 1517 GMT 6 Mar 94 AU) 

   MILITARY PLANT CONVERTS TO CIVILIAN PRODUCTION:  Shumel Ltd., a 
manufacturer of electronic equipment in Shumen (Northeastern 
Bulgaria), which until recently formed part of the military- 
industrial complex, has completed an almost 100-percent conversion 
to civilian production in the areas of telecommunications, 
medicines, and cosmetics.  (Sofia BTA in English 1517 GMT 6 Mar 94 
AU) 

   CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS IN RUSSIA:  "As many as 1,700 Bulgarian 
builders begin construction in Rostov-on-Don (Russia) of 1,600 
flats, a school, two kindergartens, a polyclinic, a shopping center, 
and entertainment facilities," the DUMA daily reports on 8 March, 
following the return from Russia of Iliya Radev, deputy minister of 
territorial development and construction, who had attended a 
ceremony to mark the start of construction.  The project, 
implemented jointly with Hochtief of Germany, will employ 4,000 
Bulgarian builders in all, DUMA reports.  The paper recalls that in 
1992 Bulgarian workers built 1,282 flats, a school, a polyclinic, 
two kindergartens, and a shopping center in Starokonstantinov in 
Ukraine.  This year Bulgarian workers will also complete a project 
in Kamenka, Russia.  (Sofia BTA in English 1133 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   CZECH REPUBLIC 

   TWO METHODS TO BE USED TO CALCULATE UNEMPLOYMENT:  Czech Prime 
Minister Vaclav Klaus said 15 March that the Czech Republic would 
continue to use two methods of calculating the unemployment rate, 
one based on jobless figures registered by employment offices and 
the other based on answers from members of 23,000 selected 
households.  Klaus told reporters that the advantages of the first 
method, used by the Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs, is that 
the unemployment rate in individual districts can be compared and 
data published at monthly intervals.  He said the second method, 
used by the Czech Statistics Office and more common throughout the 
world, does not offer a cross-section view of the jobless rate in 
the individual districts, and results are published once every three 
months.  Klaus said that differing data were therefore to be 
expected and that this was no "trick or deception on the 
government's part." (Prague CTK in English 0641 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

  FEBRUARY PRICE INCREASES:  Prices for industrial products rose by 
1 percent in February against January.  Compared with December 1993, 
they rose by 1.8 percent, and in the year-to-year comparison, they 
rose by 5.3 percent.  Prices for construction works rose by 2.1 
percent in February, and 3 percent against December 1993.  In the 
year-to-year comparison they rose 16.1 percent.  Prices for 
agricultural products stagnated in February.  Against the same month 
last year, they rose by 1 percent, and remained unchanged compared 
with December 1993. (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 17 Mar 94 p 9 AU) 

   ECONOMIC AGREEMENTS WITH UKRAINE:  Ukrainian Minister for 
External Economic Relations Oleg Slepichev and Czech Trade and 
Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy signed an agreement 17 March on 
economic cooperation between their two countries.  An agreement on 
the support and mutual protection of investments was also signed 
with Czech Finance Minister Ivan Kocarnik.  Dlouhy told reporters 
that he considered important the fact that the Czech Republic should 
sign treaties adjusting mutual business relations with all successor 
states to the Soviet Union, treaties that would correspond to the 
regulations of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade. 

   A Finance Ministry spokeswoman said that the Czech Republic was 
bound by 16 accords signed before the Czechoslovak Federation split 
(on 1 January 1993) and it automatically assumed all the 
responsibilities resulting from them.  Since the split, the Czech 
Republic has signed some 10 treaties, which are not yet in force. 
The countries concerned are Hungary, Poland, Romania, Slovenia, 
Ukraine, Tadjikistan, Thailand, Australia, Portugal and Egypt. 
Slepichev is a member of the Ukrainian delegation led by Foreign 
Minister Anatoliy Zlenko.  (Prague CTK in English 1800 GMT 17 Mar 94 
AU) 

   KLAUS ASKS FRANCE TO SUPPORT REPUBLIC'S ENTRY INTO OECD:  Prime 
Minister Vaclav Klaus in a meeting 17 March with French Minister of 
Industry Gerard Longuet asked for France's support to the Czech 
Republic's application to join the Organization for Economic 
Cooperation and Development (OECD) at the OECD session in May. 
According to Petr Stepanek from the Government Office, Klaus told 
Longuet that in spite of its good relations with Poland, Hungary and 
Slovakia, the Czech Republic does not feel the need to approach 
Western Europe together with these countries as one entity. 
According to Klaus, this is what the Czech Republic is often 
reproached for by Western countries.  Klaus noted that Norway, for 
instance, had not been reproached for laying down its own conditions 
and for not acting in coordination with other states when it 
negotiated to join the European Union.  Klaus discussed with Longuet 
possible French participation in SPT Telecom.  (Prague CTK in 
English 2111 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   RIETER HOLDING TO BUY 90 PERCENT OF ELITEX:  The Swiss 
manufacturer of textile machines, Rieter Holding Ltd., based in 
Winterthur, has bought majority stock in Rieter Elitex.  The Swiss 
company paid 100 million korunas (Kc) for its share and acquired 90 
percent of the company.  (Prague CESKY DENIK in Czech 18 Mar 94 p 8 
AU) 

   COMMERCIAL BANK TO INCREASE STAKE IN PRAGER HANDELSBANK:  The 
only bank with Czech capital, Prager Handelsbank, established 
according to the German legal system and based in Frankfurt, reached 
a balance of 320 million German marks last year.  The bank's 
customers are mainly German entities interested in commercial 
activity in the Czech Republic and Slovakia.  Ceska Obchodni Banka 
(Czech Commercial Bank) wants to buy, over the month to come, the 
shares of two major shareholders and to increase thereby its own 
share.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 18 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   ECONOMIC AGREEMENTS WITH LITHUANIA:  Lithuania and the Czech 
Republic are to sign agreements on the prevention of dual taxation 
and on the support and protection of investments, according to an 18 
March statement by finance ministry spokeswoman Ludmila Nutilova. 
That decision is a result of Lithuanian Finance Minister Eduard 
Vilkelis's visit to the Czech Republic.  The former contract is to 
be signed this May, but the date for signing the latter has not yet 
been set, Nutilova said.  The main subjects discussed by Vilkelis 
and representatives of the finance and trade and industry ministries 
were the tax systems of both countries, tax reform in the Czech 
Republic, and the ADIS system, computer technology used by the Czech 
government.  Other subjects discussed were state fiscal and 
information systems, health and social insurance, and foreign trade. 
(Prague CTK in English 1209 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   SKODA CARS TO BE ASSEMBLED IN POLAND:  The Skoda carmaker based 
in Mlada Boleslav, central Bohemia, is to transfer, for the first 
time in its history, a part of its production away from the Czech 
territory, 19 March Czech dailies quote Skoda spokesman Jiri 
Hrabovsky as saying.  Skoda Managing Board decided on Friday, 18 
March, that a part of the joint venture's production, designated for 
the Polish market, is to be assembled by FSR Polmo Tarnap enterprise 
based in the Polish town of Poznan as of July 1 1994.  The Board 
Chairman Ludvik Kalma finds the decision to be the only way for 
Skoda to return to the Polish market, according to Hrabovsky. 

   The high customs barriers make Skoda cars 41 percent more 
expensive in Poland, due to customs fees of 35 percent and a 6- 
percent surcharge imposed on car imports.  This has led to the 
decline in the sales of Skoda cars in Poland from 40,000 in 1991 to 
2,891 in 1993, the press reports.  Like Skoda, FSR Polmo Tarnap has 
also established a joint venture along with Germany's Volkswagen. 
It has already been completing Volkswagen Transporter cars, and the 
assembling of Skodas is to contribute to better use of this plant's 
capacity. 

   This year, up to 5,000 Skodas are to be completed in FSR Polmo 
Tarnap.  However, in the future the capacity could considerably 
increase.  The cars will be transported to Poland partially 
dismantled.  The main part of the car will be produced in the Czech 
Republic, while the completion of remaining parts will take place in 
Poland.  The Polish company will make an investment into a new 
assembly line.  The completion itself will be paid for by Skoda, 
Hrabovsky is quoted as saying.  He declined to specify the financial 
amounts involved.  The press also quotes unofficial sources as 
saying that the price of a new model of the Skoda Favorit, which is 
likely to appear on the market at the beginning of September, is to 
be about Kc230,000 (almost $8,000), which is 20 percent more than 
the present model. 

   With the serial production of the new type of Favorit launched, 
the old (present) type will be terminated.  The production of the 
Formans and pick-ups is to continue.  In the first two months of 
this year, Skoda registered a 13- percent decline of its world sales 
in comparison with the same period in 1993.  In the Czech Republic 
the sales dropped to half, while a decline of 70 percent, the sale 
of a mere 833 cars, was registered in Slovakia.  (Prague CTK in 
English 1500 GMT 19 Mar 94 AU) 

   CONSTRUCTION BUSINESS INCREASES 13.3 PERCENT:  According to 
preliminary results, domestic construction firms carried out work 
worth Kc6.62 billion, which is 13.3 percent more than in January 
last year.  (MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 21 Mar 94 p 14 AU) 

   DANISH FIRM BUILDS WIND-POWERED ELECTRIC POWER STATION:  A wind- 
powered electric power station with an output of 225 kilowatts -- 
the first of its kind in the countries of Central and Eastern Europe 
-- will be put into operation on the Hostyn Hill near Bystrice pod 
Hostynem in the Kromeriz region.  The power station was built by the 
Danish firm Vestas for the price of about Kc9 million.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 21 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   CSA-AIR FRANCE VENTURE ENDED:  Three agreements ending the 
Czechoslovak Airlines (CSA)-Air France joint venture were initialed 
at 03:00 (02:00 GMT) on 22 March, Czech Transport Minister Jan 
Strasky announced.  The five parties to the agreements -- CSA, Air 
France, the National Property Fund, Konsolidacni Banka, and the 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) -- only 
initialed the agreements because the EBRD management must approve 
them before they are signed.  (Prague CTK in English 1011 GMT 22 Mar 
94 AU) 

   AIR FRANCE REPRESENTATIVES RESIGN FROM CSA:  All five members of 
the board of directors and the one member of the supervisory council 
of Czechoslovak Airlines (CSA) representing Air France submitted 
their letters of resignation yesterday at CSA's extraordinary 
general meeting, Deputy Transport Minister Ivan Foltyn said 22 
March.  Their resignation is valid, he said, but it is still being 
discussed at the general meeting. 

   Within 35 days a regular general meeting is to be called, at 
which the issue of the new shareholder composition of CSA is to be 
addressed, Foltyn said.  The airlines' Articles of Association are 
to be modified and the position of the EBRD is to be changed.  The 
EBRD is to keep its 19-percent share in the company, but it will no 
longer have super-majority rights, nor will it have representatives 
on the board of directors, though it will apparently have 
representatives on the supervisory council, he added. 

   It is hoped that CSA will continue to develop as a commercial, 
profit-making company.  Its restructuring plan is to be approved at 
the general meeting, said Foltyn.  The plan, discussed at the 
January 6 general meeting, was not approved then because the Czech 
and French representatives could not reach an agreement, he added. 
The transport, finance, and privatization ministries should find a 
new partner for CSA by the end of this year, he continued.  The 
offers of potential partners are to be assessed in the near future. 

   Konsolidacni Banka (Consolidation Bank) will pay $27 million for 
Air France's shares and for options requirements, Transport Minister 
Jan Strasky said 22 Mar.  That is part of the agreement ending the 
CSA-Air France joint venture, which was initialed that morning by 
Air France, CSA, the National Property Fund, EBRD, and Konsolidacni 
Banka.  (Prague CTK in English 1611 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   CSA TO RETURN AIR FRANCE'S INVESTMENT:  Air France's $30 million 
investment in Czechoslovak Airlines (CSA) will be returned to the 
French airline in the near future, Air France chairman Christian 
Blanc said today.  Both airlines will suffer from Air France's 
withdrawal from the 1992 contract, he believes.  "It is sad for us, 
and maybe in the future it will be sad for them as well," he said. 
The main issue discussed at the negotiations in Paris was the 
purchase price of Air France's 19 percent share.  Transport Minister 
Jan Strasky requested that Air France withdraw from the contract at 
the beginning of this year, as the Czech Government last year had 
repeatedly accused Air France of being in part responsible for the 
poor management of the Czech company.  (Prague CTK in English 1855 
GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   GREEN LIGHT FOR AVIATION INDUSTRY RESTRUCTURING:  Yesterday, the 
Council of Ministers confirmed the plan of restructuring the 
aviation industry.  According to the approved proposal, Aero Prague 
Co. is to eliminate all its bank loans and thereby also the risk of 
bankruptcy.  In the final stage, only four subsidiaries will remain 
in the Holding -- Aero Vodochody, Letov Praha, Technometra Radotin, 
and the Research and Testing Aviation Institute.  The National 
Property Fund will keep 64.8 percent of the holding shares.  Aero 
will hold a 53 percent stake in the subsidiaries.  The debt clearing 
will result from the capitalization of the main creditors' claims. 
The Investicni a Postovni Banka and CSOB (Czechoslovak Foreign Trade 
Bank) will each purchase 10 percent shares of the holding 
subsidiaries at 70 percent of the nominal value, and the 
Konsolidacni banka 27 percent. 

   The tender for the purchase of majority stakes in Moravan 
Otrokovice and Motorlet Jinonice is to be evaluated in the near 
future.  The Czech Frut Ovo Co. has offered $45 million for 
Motorlet, and the Canadian firm Pratt &amp; Whitney has offered $1 
million cash, $10 million in the form of know-how, and $14 million 
in investments.  The same Frut Ovo has offered $800 million for 
Moravan, while Bata offered only know-how.  If the tender for 
Motorlet is not successful, a competition will be announced.  If the 
talks with the bidders for Moravan are not successful either, the 
Investment and Postal Bank will purchase the company, and the 
proceeds will be used to pay the Aero debts.  A competition is also 
being considered for Let Kunovice if a suitable foreign partner is 
not found. 

   Yesterday, the ministers also discussed the conditions for the 
purchase of Czechoslovak Airlines shares from Air France Co. by the 
Consolidation Bank.  Minister Karel Dyba observed that the purchase 
of the French company's stake will also be discussed by the 
government later today, but he refused to release any additional 
information.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 9 Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   DUTCH FUNDS SUPPORT SOCIAL PROJECTS:  Over the last three years, 
the Cooperating Dutch Funds subsided social projects in the Czech 
Republic with 56 million korunas (almost $2 million).  According to 
available information, subsidies helped to realize projects carried 
out by non-state organizations in social, charitable, health care 
and educational areas.  Since 1991, the Dutch Funds have been 
supporting the building and reconstruction of social and church 
structures in the Czech and Slovak republics, focusing mainly on 
social activities, initiatives and foundations aimed at children and 
youth, handicapped and elderly people.  The Cooperating Dutch Funds 
are the Queen Juliana Foundation, Catholic Needs Foundation, 
Maagdenhuis Foundation and Children's Stamps Foundation.  According 
to their Prague representatives, they are far from being the only 
Dutch foundations to aid the Czech and Slovak republics.  (Prague 
CTK in English 1028 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   INFLATION DROPS BELOW 10 PERCENT:  The Czech Republic has got 
below the 10-percent inflation mark, comparing prices of February 
1994 with those of February 1993, Czech National Bank governor Josef 
Tosovsky said 22 March.  During the opening of the third 
international financial and banking trade fair -- Fibex -- Tosovsky 
said he hoped this state of affairs would last some time.  "This 
data separates us somewhat from other central and east European 
countries and brings us closer to the more developed world," said 
Tosovsky.  He said this year will become a touchstone of the 
behavior of Czech banks, which are still very young and experiencing 
childhood illnesses and various excesses that the banking family 
cannot tolerate. 

   Tosovsky also said the Prague Stock Exchange as well as the RM 
System have found their place in society and after the second wave 
of coupon privatization may grow "not into some small local stock 
exchange, but into an exchange of regional significance".  A total 
of 382 exhibitors from 10 countries are participating in Fibex, a 
major exhibition in the field of finance in Europe.  Along with 
Fibex, an exhibition of marketing and advertising services and an 
exhibition of technology, products and services for developing towns 
and villages is taking place in Brno.  (Prague CTK in English 1140 
GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   INFORMATION ON WEAPONS TO IRAN NOT PRECISE, RDP GROUP SAYS: 
Information on the export of Czech arms to Iran is not precise, 
director general of the RDP Group joint stock company Jan Vlcek told 
journalists today.  The company was just mapping out the market, he 
added.  Vlcek was reacting to an article published in February in 
the weekly RESPEKT, according to which director general of the 
Plzen-based Skoda company Lubomir Soudek was discussing in Tehran 
with Iranian authorities possible supplies of ground-to-ground 
missiles and the modernization of T-72 tanks last December. 

   The weekly said that the RDP asked in a letter from Vlcek Trade 
and Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy for help in granting a license 
for arms exports to Iran.  The export of the technology was for the 
Czech Republic an advantageous bid in terms of financial and 
technical parameters, the letter read.  The contract consisted of 
technological equipment for the existing Iranian factory, know-how 
documents and the training of Iranian workers by Czech experts, the 
paper quoted from the letter.  Vlcek stated that the "mapping out" 
of the Arabic market was conducted by the RDP with the consent of 
the government and called the reports published in RESPEKT 
"disinformation" and groundless.  (Prague CTK in English 1714 GMT 2 
Mar 94 AU) 

   BAN EXPECTED ON SALE OF ARMS TECHNOLOGY TO IRAN:  The possibility 
that the RDP Group of Czech arms manufacturers could negotiate 
exports to Iran of repair technology for the T-72 tank is apparently 
not very likely.  RDP Group Director General Jan Vlcek asked 
Industry and Trade Minister Vladimir Dlouhy to make a political 
decision whether his company may enter the Iranian market.  Minister 
Dlouhy, according to his spokesman Kamil Cermak, is awaiting, 
however, the stance of the Foreign Minister Josef Zieleniec and 
Defense Minister Antonin Baudys. 

   A source from diplomatic circles, who does not wish to be 
identified, told MLADA FRONTA DNES yesterday that the Foreign 
Ministry intends to honor international obligations and, on 
principle, not export arms to high-risk regions.  Although Iran is 
not among the countries to which the sale of arms is banned, many 
countries consider Iran a very high-risk region.  "After all, the 
situation in Iran is not calm and clear.  It is in the interest of 
the Czech Republic not to support armament in this region," the 
diplomat added. 

   "The RDP Group does not want to export tanks to Iran, it has 
never even considered it.  The consortium discussed the possibility 
of supplying repairs technology for these tanks," RDP Group press 
spokesman Jiri Vich specified.  The planned deal with Iran should 
revive some stagnating enterprises.  The expected financial volume 
of this order, which should be filled over five years, allegedly 
amounts to $0.5 billion.  The RDP Group even founded its own bank, 
TOPFIN.  By means of this consortium of small and medium-sized 
banks, the arms manufacturing company should finance its production 
and business transactions.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 4 Mar 
94 p 2 AU) 

   AMMUNITION COMPANY PRODUCES NATO-COMPATIBLE ROUND:  The Czech 
ammunition company Sellier &amp; Bellot has begun producing a new type 
of 5.56 by 45 millimeter cartridge with NATO specifications 
designated for military use, which it developed and financed from 
its own sources.  "We have become one of the companies capable of 
manufacturing ammunition according to NATO standards, the first 
Eastern European country to do so," chairman of the company board, 
Jiri Hanak, told a news conference Tuesday (8 March). 

   The production program of Sellier &amp; Bellot focuses on the 
traditional production of sports and hunting ammunition and special 
bomb-disposal devices.  "Production for military purposes, which was 
valued at 300 million korunas before 1989, is now almost at zero 
point," said Hanak.  The company also produces packaging machinery, 
automatic machines for the food industry and products of precision 
engineering. 

   Sellier &amp; Bellot, set up in 1992, was privatized in the first 
wave of coupon privatization.  "The company management wants the 
shares (20 percent) reserved for a possible foreign partner to be 
sold in the second wave," Hanak said.  While the company's profit 
between May and December 1992 was 31 million korunas, last year it 
was 2.5 times as high.  The Sellier &amp; Bellot trademark has been used 

on the territory of the Czech Republic since 1825.  (Prague CTK in 
English 0924 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRAGUE POLICE GETS ELECTRIC-POWERED PICK-UP TRUCK:  An electric- 
powered Skoda pickup has joined the Prague Police's fleet of 
automobiles, Police Director Rudolf Blazek announced today.  The 
exhaust-free electric pick-up, manufactured by Skoda Engineering 
Ejpovice, will be used primarily by police officers placing "the 
clamp" on cars parked illegally in the city center.  The vehicle is 
recharged directly from the city's electric power network and can 
travel 60-70 kilometers on one charge.  Its maximum speed is 80 
kilometers per hour (48 miles per hour).  It costs 360,000 Czech 
korunas ($12,000).  Blazek said the Prague Police had received a 
donation from the city's ecological fund for the purchase of the 
vehicle, adding that the police hoped to purchase more of them if 
more money from the fund can be received.  (Prague CTK in English 
1613 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   AGRICULTURE POLICY TO BE LIBERAL BUT PROTECTIVE:  The Czech 
Government intends to base its agricultural policy on domestic 
production while at the same time exposing Czech producers to world 
market pressures, Agriculture Minister Josef Lux said on TV Nova 
Wednesday night.  He added that agricultural subsidies would be 
lower than in Western Europe because the Czech Republic did not have 
much money, but that the government would not lower them all at 
once.  "We want to be liberal, but we definitely cannot let 
ourselves be flooded by cheap, price-supported agricultural products 
from the West," he said, adding that in no case would the Czech 
Republic copy the European Union's current protective policies. 

   "We want this pressure to exist and to compel farmers to alter 
their patterns of behavior, but under no circumstances may this 
pressure put our producers out of business.  It must create room for 
the good ones to have a chance to realize at least a minimal amount 
of profit," Lux said.  He said it was currently impossible for Czech 
farmers to manage without subsidies.  Life without subsidies is 
still "way ahead of us." 

   "Our goal is unambiguous -- to exert pressure, together with the 
United States, Canada, and other countries, to force the EU to lower 
its level of protection...  and to talk with our neighbors about 
creating comparable conditions."  He added that the government 
wanted comparable levels of market protection but would not lower 
Czech protective measures all at once and release a flood of foreign 
goods onto the domestic market.  The current highly protectionist 
policies of the EU are primarily a political problem, he said. 
(Prague CTK in English 0713 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   STATE OF ECONOMIC REFORM IN 1993:  The dominant feature of in the 
economy development was stabilization -- maintaining balance and the 
trend to dynamically reinforce it on the macroeconomic level.  The 
partition of the CSFR did not manifest itself in the Czech Republic 
by any obvious economic problems.  Monetary policy caught the impact 
of the currency division in the first quarter and maintained the 
stability of the currency, including its rate of exchange. 
Favorable foreign currency reserves have been established.  The 
volume of exports grew significantly.  The economic standard 
measured by the volume of GNP remained basically at the 1992 level. 
The economic structure changed only through the influence of private 
enterprise.  Because of the needs of the open economy of the Czech 
state, the structure of large industry has not changed favorably. 

   The trend of the GNP development was stimulated by aggregate 
demand, indicating a recovery of economic activity.  In comparison 
with 1992, retail sales grew in 1993 by 1 percent in constant 
prices, services soared by 15 percent, investment demand rose 17 
percent (in the first to third quarters of 1993 in comparison with 
the same period a year earlier, it will decline in the fourth 
quarter because of the huge increase in the fourth quarter of 1992) 
and exports grew by 20 percent (by approximately 11 percent 
including Slovakia).  Part of the increased demand was covered by a 
stock reduction.  The aggregate supply from the main production 
sectors remained below the 1992 level:  Industrial output declined 
by 5.3 percent, construction output by 7.5 percent, and agricultural 
output by 0.8 percent.  So far, the changes in the general structure 
of industrial production have not manifested themselves 
significantly, which is demonstrated in the large setbacks in 
several industrial sectors with a high degree of labor input.  The 
exceptions, like the manufacture of cars and some other products, 
could not, overall, reverse the still low competitiveness of 
engineering production and the consumer industry. 

   The manufacture of goods declined in comparison with 1992 in all 
sectors of industry (in organizations with 25 or more employees). 
The production of goods declined on a year-to-year basis more than 
10 percent in mining non-energy raw materials, the textile and 
clothing industries, wooden goods manufacture, the production and 
processing of stone and ceramics, and particularly in the 
manufacture of machines and instruments.  Among the other sectors of 
industry, the lowest production decline was registered in the 
manufacture of leather and leather goods, the manufacture of rubber 
goods, and plastic goods production -- less that 2 percent each. 

   The decisive, and still-growing share in industrial production 
belongs to food and condiments manufacture (16.5 percent), power, 
gas, and water production (10.8 percent), metal and metal goods 
production (14.3 percent) and vehicle manufacture (8.4 percent).  In 
addition to the aforementioned sectors with a low pace of 
production, the share of the manufacture of electrical and optical 
instruments also declined (4.1 percent), so that, together with the 
manufacture of machines and instruments (7.7 percent share) and 
vehicle production, the share of the former engineering and 
electrical engineering industries amounts to approximately 20 
percent. 

   Small enterprises (with staffs of fewer than 25) and natural 
persons, registered or not registered in the enterprise register, 
demonstrated much greater economic activity.  According to a Czech 
Statistical Office estimate, the production of small enterprises and 
individuals increased by 20 percent on a year-to-year basis, while 
the production in organizations with more than 25 employees declined 
by 7.4 percent.  Small business managed to increase the volume of 
output in construction by 1.5 percent, while production in large 
enterprises declined 10.1 percent. 

   The relationship between the growth of labor productivity and 
average wages did not develop favorably.  While the GDP declined 1 
percent, the average nominal wages in the economy increased by 25 
percent and real wages by 3.5 percent; the productivity of labor in 
industry declined 1.3 percent, while nominal wages rose 23.8 percent 
and real wages 2.5 percent; and in construction, the 12.2 percent 
decline in productivity compares with a 28.6 percent increase in 
nominal wages and 6.5 percent in real wages (all in comparison of 
1993 with 1992). 

   The rate of inflation reached 20.8 percent in comparison with 
1992.  It has been affected, from the very beginning of the year, by 
the transfer to the value-added tax that was reflected in an 8 
percent price increase.  If we adjust the rate of inflation, taking 
away this effect, the inflation trend would reach less than 1 
percent per month.  While overall consumer prices rose 18.2 percent 
between December 1992 and December 1993, the prices of food products 
rose 13.2 percent and non-food products by 18 percent, catering by 
21.9 percent, and services by 25.3 percent.  Manufacturing prices in 
industry rose 11.4 percent, in construction 26.9 percent, in 
railroad, river, and air-cargo transport by 29.5 percent, in 
communications by 28.9 percent, and in farm products on average for 
the year by 6.2 percent. 

   Political stability, continuing the favorable acceptance of the 
economic reform and the economic development by a majority of the 
population, and a relatively very low rate of unemployment were the 
main reasons for social accord.  The overall unemployment rate of 
3.5 percent indicates that the fundamental material restructuring 
has not yet begun.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 10 Mar 94 p 
7 AU) 

   MORE ON STATE OF ECONOMIC REFORM IN 1993:  Foreign demand was 
boosted by undervaluing the rate of exchange of the koruna, which is 
almost triple the purchase parity.  Exports, excluding exports to 
Slovakia, rose 20 percent in comparison with 1992; including 
Slovakia, they grew, according to the estimate, by more than 11 
percent.  Because of the high volume of imports in 1992 prior to the 
currency division, imports increased 2.7 percent, excluding imports 
from Slovakia; including the estimate for Slovakia, imports were 
between 1 and 3 percent lower than in 1992.  The 1993 trade balance 
ended with a surplus of 5.9 billion korunas; without Slovakia with a 
deficit of 3.7 billion korunas. 

   The favorable development of the trade balance, which reached the 
value of 104.1 percent, was achieved by a 2 percent increase of 
export prices and a 1.7 percent reduction in the prices of imported 
goods.  Projected into the volumes of exports and imports (without 
Slovakia) the price changes in 1993 brought 12 billion korunas to 
the Czech economy in comparison with the price levels of 1992.  The 
largest trading partner was Germany -- its share of imports was 25.1 
percent and of exports 26.9 percent. 

   The surplus on the current account of the balance of payments in 
convertible currency reached $620 million (approximately 18 billion 
korunas).  The convertible currency trade deficit was made up, and 
the source of the surplus was the surplus of services and transfers 
of private and enterprise foreign currency funds.  In services, 
tourism (foreign currency income from foreigners reached $1.3 
billion) and gas transit were the sectors most responsible for the 
surplus. 

   Foreign currency reserves in the entire banking system rose at 
the end of the year to $6.2 billion, of which the Czech National 
Bank's foreign currency reserves amounted to 3.8 billion korunas. 
The Czech National Bank's reserves cover a 4-month volume of imports 
of goods and services in convertible currency.  A large part of the 
increase of foreign currency reserves reflects foreign currency 
funds drawn from abroad, which, however, also appear on the other 
side as an increase in gross indebtedness.  In addition to the 
aforementioned surplus on the current account of the balance of 
payments, it was also the inflow of capital -- above all, portfolio 
investments -- that contributed to the increase in foreign currency 
reserves.  Two issues of Czech National Bank bonds, with a volume of 
$0.7 billion, should be mentioned first.  Foreign investments in 
securities on the domestic capital market also increased 
significantly.  Foreign currency credits obtained by domestic firms 
directly from abroad were also among the sources of long-term 
capital.  The inflow of direct investments from abroad declined in 
comparison with 1992 to reach $561 million (direct investments from 
abroad for 1992 to 1993 amount to $2.053 billion). 

   Macroeconomic stability was actively affected in 1993 by the 
state budget.  As opposed to the countries of the former Eastern 
bloc and most Western European countries, the state budget had a 
surplus of 1.1 billion korunas, with planned revenues surpassed by 
4.6 percent and expenditures by 4.3 percent.  The basis of budget 
revenues was taxes, specifically income tax (71.9 billion korunas), 
value-added tax and consumer tax (107.5 billion korunas), and social 
security premiums (106.0 billion korunas). 

   While the monetary policy of the Czech National Bank was 
moderately restrictive and careful in early 1993, it relaxed in the 
second half of the year.  The stability of the purchasing power of 
the koruna prevailed.  The rate of exchange against the dollar did 
not substantially change in the course of the year and hovered at 
about 29.15 korunas per dollar.  The money supply rose by 17.5 
percent in the course of the year, i.e. it moved more slowly than 
inflation. 

   The main reason for the growth of the money supply is the credits 
provided to the enterprise sector.  The credits increased overall by 
107 billion korunas to reach 678 billion korunas at the end of the 
year.  The decline of the share of long-term credits and the 
concurrent increase in short-term credits were affected by the 
unclear nature of the development programs, uncertainty in the area 
of management stability, and the worsening financial situation of 
the enterprises together with fear on the part of the banks of the 
growing volume of risk credits, estimated at more than one-fifth of 
total credits.  The credit policy was marked by high security for 
the credits and relatively high credits.  The interest rate began to 
decline after the June reduction of the discount rate from 9.5 
percent to 8.0 percent, but it is still higher than the interest 
rates charged on credit abroad.  Therefore, in late 1993, the inflow 
of foreign capital in the form of credit became more significant. 
The volume of deposits increased in 1993 by 117 billion korunas to 
reach 636 billion korunas. 

   The trend in living standards was characterized in 1993 by a high 
growth of nominal wages, i.e. 28 percent in comparison with the 
previous year.  Even with the 20.8 percent growth of consumer 
prices, the real income of the population rose by 6 percent.  Real 
wages rose by 3.5 percent.  The real income of the population was 
still 15 percent lower than it was in 1989. 

   With the aforementioned average data, the living standard of 
individual groups and strata of the population began to differ 
significantly according to the per capita income in the applicable 
household groups.  The demographic development of the Czech Republic 
was marked, as in the previous several years, by a low natural 
increase in the population.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 11 
Mar 94 p 3 ) 

   COST OF LIVING INCREASES 1.2 PERCENT IN JANUARY:  According to 
statistics from the Czech Statistical Office, the cost of living in 
the Czech Republic increased by 1.2 percent in January this year 
compared with December 1993.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF 12 Mar 94 p 6 
AU) 
   CONSUMER PRICE INDEX ROSE 0.2 PERCENT IN FEBRUARY:  The consumer 
price index rose only 0.2 percent in February over its January 
level.  Food prices declined 0.2 percent, and prices for other types 
of goods and for services rose 0.4 percent.  According to the Czech 
Statistical Office, the consumer price index rose 9.7 percent in 
comparison with February 1993.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 11 Mar 94 
p 1 AU) 

   JANUARY INDUSTRIAL OUTPUT:  The volume of industrial production 
in January 1994 reached 103.3 percent (in current prices) of the 
January 1993 level.  This folows from most recent data provided by 
the Czech Statistical Office.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 11 Mar 94 
p 2 AU) 

   KLAUS, BANK GOVERNOR STRESS NEED FOR KORUNA STABILITY:  The heads 
of both the Czech Government and Czech National Bank (CNB) consider 
the stable exchange rate of the Czech koruna to be the principal 
tenet of the national economy, Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus and CNB 
Governor Josef Tosovsky told reporters today after a meeting between 
the prime minister and the CNB Council.  The prime minister 
emphasized that all economic and price factors should be based on 
this exchange rate, and not the other way around.  He refused to 
speculate on the prospective reduction of the rate.  Bank Governor 
Tosovsky explained the government's position with details concerning 
foreign currency reserves.  Since January 1st, the CNB has purchased 
hard currency for more than 600 million dollars, augmenting its 
reserves by half a billion dollars.  Tosovsky said the entire 
banking system currently holds $6.7 billion in hard currency, with 
the Central Bank controlling 4.3 billion of that total.  He 
considers these reserves allow for an adequate amount of 
maneuverability and help maintain the exchange rate at its current 
level. 

   The Czech National Bank, together with the Finance Ministry, is 
preparing material for a meeting of economic ministers in mid-April 
where further steps to expand the convertibility of the Czech koruna 
will be discussed.  The first step is expected to complete the 
internal convertibility of the currency, that is, the termination of 
the exchange limit for citizens, and the liberalization of the ebb 
and flow of capital (in direct investments) to and from the 
republic.  The second step includes the freeing of restrictions 
regarding the capital accounts balance:  the flow of capital abroad 
in portfolio investments and deposits in foreign banks.  Klaus said 
the government and the CNB had "identical or nearly identical" 
opinions on the basic developing trends of the Czech and world 
economies, and were "immensely similar" in their basic opinions on 
further financial procedures.  (Prague CTK in English 2112 GMT 11 
Mar 94 AU) 

   OFFICE SUPPLY COMPANY TO BE PRIVATIZED:  The capital stock of the 
Koh-i-noor office supplie company in Prague is worth Kc188 million, 
according to company director Pavel Bohuminsky.  Of this, 86 percent 
will be offered in the second wave of coupon privatization, while 10 
percent will remain in the National Property Fund and the rest in 
the Restitution Fund.  The amount of Koh-i-noor claims is Kc25 
millions; obligations amount to Kc20 million.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY 
11 Mar 94, FINANCNI NOVNINY Supplement, p 1 AU) 

   LUX PRAISES QUALITY OF DOMESTIC FOOD PRODUCTS:  The quality of 
domestic foodstuffs is comparable with that of foreign producers and 
in many cases is even higher, Czech Agriculture Minister Josef Lux 
said today on Czech Television.  Lux said that there has been 
considerable improvement in this area, adding that only in packaging 
techniques was the Czech food industry behind in some places. 
Unlike in the past when foreigners were afraid to buy food here, 
now, especially in border regions, they buy quality Czech food 
products cheaply and in large amounts, Lux said. 

   The government expects foodstuffs prices to increase by 8 to 9 
percent this year, Lux said, adding that spending on food products 
has been decreasing since 1991.  This is caused partly by the fact 
that the prices of other consumer goods have been increasing faster 
and people have to spend more on them.  Foodstuffs prices are not 
therefore a factor causing inflation, Lux said.  Chairman of the 
Union of Landowners and Private Farmers Vlastimil Tlusty, also on 
the Czech television program, said that specific means of 
eliminating the large difference between the costs at which farmers 
produce their products and' the price at which processing factories 
buy the products are missing in the agricultural program approved by 
the government.  He welcomed the program as a big help for 
agriculture but said it needed further work. 

   Referring to the government agricultural program Lux said that 
its short-time goal was to ensure farmers access to capital through 
the Guarantee Fund.  Banks are currently refusing loans to farmers 
and the Guarantee Fund will provide guarantees to banks and farmers 
and also cover part of the interest.  The second goal is the change 
in the structure of agriculture, Lux said.  He said that the long- 
term objective of the program is to stabilize the prices of food 
products through the Market Regulation Fund.  Pressure on the 
European Union countries to reduce the protection of their markets 
should help achieve this goal, Lux said.  (Prague CTK in English 
1911 GMT 13 Mar 94 AU) 

   HIGHER PROFITS FOR BANKS, INSURANCE COMPANIES IN 1993:  The 
overall profit of banks and insurance companies in 1993 reached 
Kc2O.555 billion before taxes, which is 54.7 percent more than in 
1992.  The capital stock of banks increased by Kc38.356 billion, 
reaching Kc105.410 billion.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF 15 March 94 p 6 
AU) 

   ECONOMIC RELATIONS WITH ITALY:  Trade between the Czech Republic 
and Italy increased by some 35 percent in 1993.  Italian 
entrepreneurs consider the Czech Republic as a completely stable 
European country.  Italian investment funds are showing interest in 
shares of Czech enterprises.  This is what Dr. Roberto Luongo, 
director of the Prague office of the Italian Foreign Trade Office 
said in an interview for RUDE PRAVO.  Italy is the fifth most 
important trading partner of the Czech Republic.  Machines are the 
main item in Italian exports.  Exports of consumer goods and food 
products to our markets are also increasing.  The Czech Republic 
exports steel products, plastic material products, and paper to 
Italy.  (Prague RUDE PRAVO 15 Mar 94 p 10 AU) 

   CZECH KORUNA DEVALUED IN RESPONSE TO SLOVAK SURCHARGE:  In 
reaction to the Slovak-introduced import surcharge the Czech 
Republic will this afternoon devalue the Czech koruna 3 percent 
within the clearing ECU, which is used in payments between the two 
countries, Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus announced.   Speaking after 
an emergency meeting of economic ministers, Klaus said the Czech 
Republic expected the 10 percent surcharge introduced as from 
Thursday to be in force only until July 1.  (Prague CTK in English 
1214 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   SYNOPSIS OF CZECH-SLOVAK CUSTOMS UNION:  Sixteen months ago, on 
29 October 1993, the Czech Republic and Slovakia signed a customs 
union agreement, which contained the following principles: 

   - the creation of a single customs area, comprising the customs 
areas of the two contracting countries; 

   - securing freedom of movement for goods and services within this 
single customs area, avoiding customs and non-tariff measures; 

   - a common customs tariff between contracting states and a common 
customs and trade policy toward a third country; 

   - common customs legislation, agreed tariff measures and the same 
customs practice in using the same customs certificates; 

   - the coordination of duties will be conducted by the equally 
represented Customs Union Council and its Permanent Secretariat. 
Disputes between contracting sides are to be resolved through 
agreement within the framework of the Arbitration Commission.  The 
Customs Union Council will represent the contracting states in 
matters concerning the customs union abroad, including the 
Commission of the European Union. 

   Council sessions are held at least once every three months.  The 
chairman calls a session whenever one of the contracting states so 
requests.  The statutes of the Customs Union Council and the 
establishment of the Permanent Secretariat were decided at the 
session in Bratislava on 18 January 1993.  Czech Trade and Industry 
Minister was the first elected Council Chairman; the position is 
honorary and is held by representatives of alternate states every 
six months.  The executive body is the Permanent Secretariat, based 
in Bratislava.  Its director general is Rudolf Besik. 

   The budget for the operation of the customs union for 1993 should 
be 15 million crowns ($515,000).  Slovak economy minister Jaroslav 
Kubecka was elected council chairman on 23 August 1993, and since 17 
January 1994 it has been chaired by the new Slovak Economy Minister, 
Jan Ducky.  (Prague CTK in English 1141 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   MEETING SET ON CZECH-GERMAN OIL PIPELINE:  Industry and Trade 
Minister Vladimir Dlouhy leaves on March 4 for Weidhaus, Germany, to 
discuss the construction of the Ingolstadt oil pipeline with 
Bavarian Economics Minister Otto Wiesheu.  The ministers will 
discuss in particular the unresolved issue of who will take over 
guarantees for uninsurable and unpredictable damage to the pipeline, 
ministry spokesman Kamil Cermak said today.  Last week Dlouhy said 
that the February 1 ministerial meeting had recommended that the 
agreement on guarantees be concluded by a Czech organization, with a 
guarantee from the National Property Fund (FNM).  Wiesheu told 
Dlouhy that Bavaria would welcome it if the guarantees were given by 
the FNM. 

   Premier Vaclav Klaus said after the ministerial meeting that it 
was impossible for the Czech Republic to conclude an international 
agreement with Bavaria, an entity that is not at its legal level. 
The demand for guarantees has been raised by the Bavarian farmers' 
union, which is concerned that the construction of the oil pipeline 
might infringe the ownership rights of persons owning land through 
which the oil pipeline is to lead.  Head of the Bavarian Economics 
Ministry power department Robert Dehner told CTK that the variant 
favoring guarantees on the part of the FNM is acceptable for Germany 
but he indicated that Munich wanted to add "a new proposal". 

   According to information from other well-informed Bavarian 
sources, the Bavarian government has not yet completely accepted 
Prague's offer for guarantees of the Czech side to be taken over 
solely by the FNM and for the Prague government not to participate 
at all.  Bavaria's proposal may therefore include a demand for some 
form of guarantees from the Czech government.  (Prague CTK in 
English 2010 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL PROPERTY FUND TO PROVIDE PIPELINE GUARANTEE:  Trade and 
Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy agreed here today with the 
Bavarian Economy minister Otto Wiesheuem that the National Property 
Fund (FNM) would provide a guarantee for uninsurable damages to the 
oil pipeline that will run from Ingolstadt, Bavaria to Nelahozeves, 
central Bohemia.  The FNM will deposit the guarantee of 80 million 
German marks with the Czech national Bank for the whole period of 
existence of the pipeline, stated Wiesheuem.  Dlouhy said that the 
FNM was happy to do so because of the significant amount of interest 
that it would receive from the deposit.  He added that if the FNM 
ceased to exist while the pipeline was still in operation, the state 
would take over the guarantee.  The pipeline is expected to operate 
for 20 to 25 years. 

   Dlouhy expects the guarantee from the Bavarian side to come from 
the Bavarian government or a state organization.  "In the case of 
terrorist attack, each side would cover half the damage.  If there 
is war or revolution, both sides have the right to withdraw from the 
agreement", stressed Dlouhy.  Details of the agreement will be 
worked out by a group of experts on March 14, according to 
Wiesheuem.  The agreement should be ready for signing by the end of 
March. 

   The Bavarian Government has prepared legislation enabling 
construction of the pipeline to go ahead, which the Bavarian 
parliament is expected to approve in April.  It was necessary to 
resolve the issue of the guarantee against damages resulting from 
acts of God before the legislation could be passed.  Construction of 
the pipeline began on the Czech side last September and will begin 
in Germany this spring.  The project should be completed in 1995. 
(Prague CTK in English 2019 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   'STEADY' GAS SUPPLIES FROM CIS TO CZECH REPUBLIC, SLOVAKIA: 
Natural gas supplies from the territory of the Commonwealth of 
Independent States (CIS) to the Czech Republic and Slovakia are 
steady, head of the Velke Kapusany international pumping station, 
Vaclav Vasil, said 7 March.  The limiting of supplies only concerns 
Russian gas supplies to Ukraine but not Russian supplies to the 
Czech Republic and Slovakia, Vasil said, adding that according to an 
employee of the Russian company Gazprom there are no grounds for 
anxiety over the possibility of reduced supplies in the foreseeable 
future.  (Prague CTK in English 1122 GMT 7 Mar 94 AU) 

   MINISTERS TO DISCUSS KORUNA'S CONVERTIBILITY:  Government 
ministers today discussed coordination between the Czech National 
Bank and the Finance Ministry in drawing up further documents on the 
move to full convertibility of the Czech koruna.  Economics Minister 
Karel Dyba said after the  8 March meeting that the central bank is 
expected to submit the document to ministers at the end of April. 
Dyba said the ministers did not discuss a specific term for the 
move.  Premier Vaclav Klaus said after a ministerial meeting on 
January 20 that the ministers gave "a green light" to gradual 
deregulation and liberalization steps leading to full convertibility 
of the koruna.  (Prague CTK in English 2044 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   CZECH, HUNGARIAN AGRICULTURE MINISTERS SIGN AGREEMENTS:  The 
Czech and Hungarian governments today signed an agreement on 
cooperation in the veterinary sector and crop protection, and an 
inter-ministry agreement on cooperation in agriculture, the food 
industry, and forest management.  The two agriculture ministers, 
Josef Lux and Janos Szabo, signed for the two governments.  Szabo is 
presently visiting the Czech Republic to exchange information on 
agricultural problems and to discuss bilateral relations and the 
international agriculture situation.  The ministers agreed they 
would like to lower tariffs by half on agricultural products even 
before 1998, the year specified by the Central European Free Trade 
Agreement (CEFTA), although they did not discuss specific goods. 
Eventually they would like to eliminate all tariffs.  Szabo 
expressed interest in the progress of restitution and privatization 
of agricultural property, and familiarized Lux with the Hungarian 
system of state support for agriculture.  (Prague CTK in English 
1655 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   HUNGARY 

   OPEL RACE CARS PRODUCED IN HUNGARY:  The Hungarian Opel factory 
of General Motors is producing racing cars this month.  The unit, 
located in Szentgotthard (western Hungary), specializes in Opel 
Astras, but now they have an extra commission to make 43 specially 
formed and equipped racing cars for use in speed and mountain races 
to be held by the Hungarian Federation for Automobile and Motor 
Sports Federation.  The racing Astras will have 1600-cc, 100-HP 
engines with separately injected cylinders, and they are expected to 
reach a maximum of 190 km/hour.  (Budapest MTI in English 0859 GMT 
23 Mar 94 AU) 

   SAMSUNG DISPLAY CENTER:  The Samsung Electronics Hungarian Rt. is 
planning to raise its annual turnover by 50 percent in 1994.  Of its 
total production, worth 5.5 billion forints (HUF), Samsung plans to 
distribute HUF3.5 billion in Hungary, and sell the rest abroad ($1 
equals HUF103), the head of the Hungarian Samsung branch, Yeak Park 
said at the inauguration of a new Samsung show center in Budapest. 
The Korean firm has been present on the Hungarian market since 1989. 
Its television factory in Jaszfenyszaru (central Hungary) employs 
over 200 people.  Last year the firm sold TV sets worth HUF1 
billion, and the value of exports corresponded to HUF3 billion.  For 
this year 150,000 color TV sets have been scheduled, with 90,000 
going to export.  The three-storey building, the first show center 
of Samsung in Europe, has 360 square meters of space, including 
several offices, showrooms, and conference rooms.  The center was 
constructed for $1.5 million.  Hungary was the first of the one-time 
Comecon countries to open a representation office in South Korea 
seven years ago.  The two countries established diplomatic ties five 
years ago. Commercial turnover, at zero seven years ago, almost 
reached $87 million last year.  Samsung has so far invested $4.6 
million in Hungary, corresponding to one-tenth of all Korean 
investments in this country.  (Budapest MTI in English 1334 GMT 17 
Mar 94 AU) 

   MALEV SET TO APPROVE CAYMAN ISLANDS SUBSIDIARY:  The founding of 
the Aircraft Leasing Company (MALCO) in the Cayman Islands by MALEV 
Air Transport Company is to be approved by MALEV's shareholders at 
the March 26 general meeting, a director of MALCO, Gabor Cseti said. 
MALCO was registered in the Cayman Islands on 22 December last year. 
MALEV transferred the ownership of the two Boeing 767-200s, which it 
purchased last year, to MALCO for $1 apiece.  Malev is now leasing 
them back.  The leasing agreement has been approved by the American 
Eximbank, which guarantees the loan of $123 million financing the 
purchase of the two aircraft.  The agreement is also expected to be 
approved by MALEV shareholders. 

   The leasing agreement to be set up does not include any terms 
regarding the purchase option, a very advantageous arrangement for 
MALEV in terms of taxation and customs duty.  This method -- unusual 
in Hungary -- was deemed necessary because the $123 million 12-year 
loan for the purchase of the aircraft is to appear in MALEV's 
balance sheet in forints, which has a negative impact on the balance 
sheet, although it does not influence MALEV's liquidity.  As a 
result, the HUF1.7 billion, which -- due to the depreciation of the 
forint -- should have been introduced as a loss, need not actually 
be represented in last year's balance sheet.  Of MALEV's HUF7.69 
billion registered capital, 30 percent is held by the Italian 
airline Alitalia, 5 percent by the Italian Simest, and 4.5 percent 
by employees.  The remaining shares are held by the Hungarian State 
Property Management Corporation.  According to current law, 50 
percent plus one vote of MALEV should permanently remain in the 
hands of the state.  (Budapest MTI in English 0739 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   FRENCH FIRM TO BE 'ACTIVE PARTICIPANT' IN HUNGARIAN ECONOMY:  The 
French Sanofi, holding a majority share in Budapest's Chinoin 
pharmaceutical factory, has come to Hungary not to export its 
products but to be an active participant in Hungary's economy, 
offering genuine partnership, said Sanof i director Jean-Francois 
Dehecq in Budapest.  He said that due to its strategy, also adjusted 
to Hungarian conditions, Sanofi has become an integral part of 
Hungary's pharmaceutical industry ahead of its rivals.  Preliminary 
balance-sheet figures show profits and better results than last 
year, Dehecq said.  Sanofi-Winthrop presently has a 51-percent stake 
in Chinoin, and is ready to buy more if it gets a reasonable offer. 
They plan no new large-scale privatization in Hungary, but are open 
to investing in medicines, as well as in the cosmetics and bio 
industries.  Sanofi and Winthrop have invested $100 million in 
Chinoin so far, and they are planning further investments in 
research equipment.  Chinoin's excellent research team, in 
cooperation with the Toulouse Research Center, is expected to come 
out with major results in the near future, research manager Pierre 
Simon said.  Dehecq said Eastern Europe figures prominently in their 
long-term strategy.  They plan further expansion and privatization 
in Poland, Bulgaria, and possibly in the former Soviet republics. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1807 GMT 19 Mar 94 AU) 

   REVERSE REPO RATE INCREASED TO 21 PERCENT: The Hungarian National 
Bank (MNB) has increased its interest rate for one-week reverse repo 
deals from 15 percent to 21 percent.  The change is effective from 
March 17.  Other repo conditions remained unchanged.  The change is 
the first in the repo system since February 14, when the MNB stopped 
offering two-week, six-month, and 12-month repo facilities and 
introduced one-week reverse repo deals. The rise in the shortest- 
term reverse repo rate follows a 1-percent cut in the mandatory 
reserve rate to 13 percent on March 1.  The MNB still pays an annual 
2 percent on banks' mandatory reserves on forint deposits and the 
rate on forint reserves against forex deposits was raised from 11 to 
18 percent also on March 1.  A further 1-percent reduction in the 
mandatory reserve rate to 12 percent will come into force on May 1. 
In line with its announced tight monetary policies for 1994, the MNB 
earlier said that it planned to drain excess liquidity released by 
the reduction in the mandatory reserve rate.  As banks have to meet 
mandatory reserve requirements based on their average level of 
deposits in the preceding two weeks, the effects of the March 1 cut 
only began to work through on March 15.  It is estimated that the 
March move released liquidity in excess of HUF10 billi6n.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 1321 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   FREE TRADE AGREEMENT WITH SLOVENIA:  The creation of a free trade 
agreement between Hungary and Slovenia will provide impetus to the 
development of bilateral economic cooperation.  The expert-level 
preparation of such an agreement was completed recently.  Hungarian- 
Slovenian trade relations showed a dynamic expansion over the past 
two years.  In 1993, the value of bilateral trade was more than $200 
million.  Hungarian exports to Slovenia were worth $140 million. 
Turnover is expected to further expand in 1994, mainly because the 
legal conditions of inter-state trade have considerably improved for 
entrepreneurs of both countries.  (Budapest MTI in English 2118 GMT 
21 Mar 94 AU) 

   HUNGARIAN-SLOVENIAN INDUSTRIAL COOPERATION AGREEMENT:  Minister 
of Industry and Trade Janos Latorcai held talks with Slovenian 
Minister of Economy Maks Tajnikar on the creation of a Hungarian- 
Slovenian industrial cooperation agreement.  The agreement under 
preparation will improve conditions for industrial cooperation and 
tourism relations. Direct expert talks are to be organized later in 
the energy field.  The two countries are to hold talks on 
implementation of the Adria LNG project, the liquefied natural gas 
siphoning station.  The ministers also reviewed the draft of the 
Hungarian-Slovenian free trade agreement, which is to be signed by 
the ministers of foreign trade of the two countries in Ljubljana on 
April 6. (Budapest MTI in English 1855 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   AVERAGE EARNINGS UP IN JANUARY:  According to the latest Central 
Statistical Office figures on companies with more than 10 employees, 
the average monthly net earnings were HUF19,540 in January 1994, 
26.7 percent up in nominal terms on the same month last year.  The 
average gross monthly wage rose by 24.8 percent to HUF27,117.  The 
higher increase in average net earnings as against gross earnings 
was a result of changes in income tax rules at the beginning of the 
year, which favored lower incomes.  The gross average earnings of 
full-time manual workers were 22.7 percent higher and their net 
earnings 24.7 percent higher than in January last year.  In the same 
period, the HUF39,579 average gross monthly earnings of white-collar 
workers rose by 25.4 percent, resulting a 27.8-percent net increase. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1610 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   CONSUMER PRICE INFLATION IN FEBRUARY:  Central Statistical Office 
figures for February consumer price increases: 
BOT 
Change (Percent) 

Item                                in  1 Month  in  12 Months 

Foodstuffs                                   +1.6    +16.4 
Alcoholic Beverages, Tobacco                 +1.4    +13.5 
Clothing                                     +0.0    +14.9 
Consumer durables                            +0.8    +10.6 
Household energy                             +0.6    +12.6 
Other industrial articles, fuels             +1.3    +18.5 
Services                                     +2.1    +20.8 
TOTAL                                        +1.4    +16.6 
EOT 
Source:  Central Statistical Office (Budapest MTI in English 1400 
GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   INFLATION 16.2 PERCENT IN 12 MONTHS:  In February the consumer 
price level rose by 1.4 percent against January's level, bringing 
inflation over the past 12 months up by only 16.2 percent -- the 
lowest value in four years.  On the basis of positive price trends 
earlier this year, a good chance is seen for this year's inflation 
to remain below 20 percent.  (Budapest MTI in English 1816 GMT 18 
Mar 94 AU) 

   AV RT TO TAKE OUT REFINANCING LOAN:   The State Property Holding 
Corporation (AV Rt) is to take out a HUF100 billion loan on 
international capital markets in order to restructure loans 
previously taken out on disadvantageous terms with a view to making 
the companies involved more attractive to potential buyers.  These 
loans now represent an interest burden of at least 25 percent per 
annum.  Managing director Lajos Csepi said that the plan is subject 
to approval of AV Rt's board of directors, which is expected by the 
middle of April.  No state guarantees will be needed since AV Rt's 
property stock is large enough in itself.  AV Rt invited eight 
foreign financial institutions in a closed tender and will choose a 
bank that has an office in Budapest.  Companies will be selected for 
the loan scheme on very strict conditions.  The most important 
criterion will be that the company's export turnover should cover 
the amount of the actual repayment.  (Budapest MTI in English 0732 
GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   CURRENT ACCOUNT DEFICIT $3.455 BILLION FOR 1993:  Hungary's 
current account deficit was $3,455 million in 1993, according to the 
most recent report from the Hungarian National Bank (MNB).  The 
trade deficit in the current account stood at $3,247 million and 
tourism showed a net $442 million surplus.  Hungary's current 
account closed with a $324 million surplus in 1992, when the trade 
balance deficit was only $49 million.  The net surplus from tourism 
was $590 million in 1992.  The overall balance of payments showed a 
$2,635 million surplus due to total direct foreign capital inflow of 
$2,339 million, while long-term external borrowing last year 
amounted to $6,388 million, including loans taken out by companies. 
Principal and interest payments totalled $3,322 million. 
International reserves stood at $6,736.2 million at the end of 1993, 
compared to $4,380.1 million at the end of 1992.  Gross foreign debt 
amounted to $24,560.2 million at the end of last year, as against 
$21,437.7 million at the end of the previous year.  Direct foreign 
cash investment totalled $5,575.9 million at the end of last year, 
compared to $3,423.8 million the previous year.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1416 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   HUNGARY TO JOIN NEW INTERNATIONAL EXPORT-CONTROL SYSTEM: Hungary 
is willing to join -- hopefully as a founding member -- the 
successor organization to COCOM, the Hungarian Government decided 
this week.  COCOM will cease to exist in its present form on March 
31.  Hungary's interests in national security and international 
trade demand participation in any new organization set up to control 
or restrict exports of sensitive or high-technology products to 
countries regarded as unstable, undemocratic, or hostile.  Therefore 
the cabinet has authorized the minister of international economic 
relations to negotiate with COCOM's successor on the register of 
products to be controlled, and submit it to the government after an 
international consensus has been reached.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1238 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   MULTINATIONALS SPEND MOST ON ADVERTISING:  According to the 
Mahir-Observer press service that surveys national radio and 
television channels and 240 major newspapers, multinational 
companies spent most on advertising in 1993, giving preference to 
Television Channel 1.  Unilever leads the list with $9 million -- 
paid in forints -- and Procter &amp; Gamble follows with $4.6 million. 
A domestic company, TV Shop, is third on the list.  The State 
property agency spent $1.5 million, which puts it in 13th place, 
ahead of the Coca-Cola Company or Tchibo.  The above amounts only 
contain the broadcasting and publishing costs.  Television's Channel 
1 received $67.1 million, the largest amount, for advertising, 
followed by Channel 2 with $22.7 million.  Danubius Radio was third 
with $8.9 million.  (Budapest NEPSZABADSAG in Hungarian 16 Mar 94 p 
13 AU) 

   CENTRAL BANK REAFFIRMS STRICT MONETARY POLICY FOR 1994:  The 
Hungarian National Bank (MNB) has recently added a supplement to its 
report on the 1994 monetary policy guidelines.  The central bank 
said that while some of the changes in the economy had not been 
foreseen when the report was prepared, the basic objective of the 
monetary policy -- to avoid a deterioration in the country's 
external balance -- would not need to be modified.  The MNB also 
reaffirmed that a strict monetary policy was needed to achieve that 
goal.  The central bank said the financing requirements of the state 
budget and the corporate sector should be adjusted to the increase 
in domestic savings and to the predicted level of foreign direct 
capital inflow over the long term.  The central bank is going to 
pursue an interest rate policy that stimulates savings, so that 
domestic loans can be financed from domestic savings.  At the same 
time, the bank will also take steps to encourage banks to narrow the 
margin between deposit and lending rates. 

   The supplement to the report states that the 1994 current account 
deficit should not exceed the 1993 level of around 3 billion forints 
(HUF) and should not be higher than the amount of direct foreign 
investment expected this year.  This differs from the original 
report in which the bank foresaw direct foreign investment of $1.3- 
1.5 billion, and said that the current account deficit should not be 
more than $1.5-2 billion.  In 1993, foreign investment totalled 
$2.1-2.2 billion, including the $875 million from the privatization 
of the Hungarian Telecommunications Company (MATAV Rt), which came 
through in the last days of 1993.  The supplement emphasizes that 
while some high-value privatization deals and other projects may 
have a considerable influence on 1994 foreign capital inflow, the 
financing of the current account deficit should not be based on 
privatization revenue in the long term.  The net indebtedness of 
companies was higher than expected in the last months of 1993.  It 
is still unclear whether this was the result of companies investing 
more or covering losses.  There may be a danger that if personal 
savings do not increase as required, the external indebtedness of 
the country will be higher than expected, no matter how tight the 
monetary policy.  The central bank said that any increase in the 
state's revenue resulting from a possible expansion in the economy 
should not lead to increased budget expenditure so as to make room 
for the business sector to expand. 

   In a development not foreseen at the time the report was drawn 
up, the 1994 budget law stipulates that the central bank must 
guarantee the purchase of HUF80 billion worth of state securities. 
This means the central bank may be forced to decrease financing to 
the banking sector, instead of increasing it as originally planned. 
The MNB estimates that it is able to grant total refinancing both to 
the budget and to the banking system of up to the increase in its 
own resources, estimated at HUF80-90 billion.  The central bank said 
it was particularly important that state securities should be issued 
in accordance with demand and at market interest rates so that the 
MNB could grant resources to others than the state budget.  If 
direct foreign loans and the indebtedness of enterprises and the 
state grows faster than targeted, the MNB's objective of preventing 
a deterioration in the external balance could be achieved only by 
reducing the foreign indebtedness of the banking system.  Hence, the 
central bank could have to cut domestic financing. 

   In another new development, foreign investors may soon be able to 
purchase Hungarian state bonds making Hungarian interest rate and 
exchange rate policies more dependent on developments on 
international markets.  The tight monetary policy could be relaxed 
only if some of the favorable changes that occurred in the fourth 
quarter of last year persisted over the long term.  If not, the 
central bank will request the government to make adjustments to 
economic policy, particularly to fiscal policy, in addition to the 
MNB's own monetary measures.  (Budapest MTI in English 1733 GMT 9 
Mar 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK ISSUES STATE BONDS IN LUXEMBOURG:  The Hungarian 
National Bank (MNB) issued bonds to a face value of 2 billion 
Luxembourg francs (LUF) (100 million German marks) in Luxembourg on 
8 March.  The bonds, which have a maturity of seven years, were 
issued at 101.9 percent and the bonds bear fixed interest of 8 7/8 
percent.  The issue was lead-managed by Banque et Caisse d'Epargne 
d'Etat and Dresdner Bank Luxembourg.  Further issues of bonds will 
be decided on the basis of conditions on foreign capital markets. 

   The central bank targeted the Luxembourg capital market because 
it is still relatively new, having been liberalized two years ago, 
and is relatively easy to approach.  The LUF2-billion issue is a 
large issue for that market, with the highest previous issue 
amounting to LUF3 billion.  The issue of "global" bonds planned by 
the MNB is not expected to take place for some time, as interest 
rates on the U.S. dollar market have become unfavorable.  The MNB 
collected a total of $4.5 billion through bond issues last year. 
There were two issues of bonds to a total value of $1.1 billion at 
the end of last year, with the revenue to be collected in 1994.  The 
MNB has not set a level for bond issues for this year, but bond 
issues could amount to as much as $2 billion, depending on the 
conditions on international capital markets.  Hungary's external 
financing requirements will be covered by the amounts which will 
flow in this year and by foreign exchange reserves of $7 billion. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1358 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   IMF STAND-BY LOAN NOT DRAWN UPON IN 1993:  Hungary has not drawn 
upon the stand-by loan that the IMF granted it last year because it 
did not need the money and it could not have met the IMF's 
requirements concerning limits on its balance of payments and 
central budget deficits, Hungarian National Bank Chairman Peter Akos 
Bod said.  From negotiations with senior IMF and World Bank 
officials, Bod concluded that Budapest has a good chance of taking 
over Vienna's role as East-Central Europe's financial center. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1943 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   INCREASE IN PERSONAL FOREIGN CURRENCY ALLOWANCE:  Effective April 
1, Hungarians going abroad can now buy $800 worth of foreign 
currency a year from the Hungarian National Bank (MNB) -- up from 
$350, as Finance Minister Ivan Szabo said.  However, unused 
allowances can no longer be carried over from one year to the next, 
even in part.  According to the MNB, the decision was another step 
toward the full convertibility of the forint.  He added that, so 
far, Hungarians are only purchasing about two-thirds of the foreign 
currency available to them.  The allocation will be $300 for under- 
14s.  Travellers will be allowed to book hotel accommodation, meals, 
transport, and other services for forints without any time limit 
rather than for stays of only up to 14 days as before.  They will 
also be able to buy more than one air ticket to non-European 
destinations a year.  The annual foreign currency limit for 
Hungarians was $50 in the 1970's -- $100 later.  The idea of raising 
it in line with the national balance of payments came up in the late 
1980's.  (Budapest MTI in English 1858 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   ECONOMIC TALKS WITH JAPAN:  Minister of International Economic 
Relations Bela Kadar was in Tokyo for talks on bilateral trade and 
Hungary's admission to the Organization for Economic Cooperation and 
Development (OECD) with Japanese Deputy Foreign Minister Koichiro 
Matsura and State Secretary of International Trade and Industry 
Sozaburo Okamatsu.  Hungary can meet the requirements of OECD 
membership, Kadar said, arguing that Hungary's level of economic and 
cultural development matches that of South Korea and Mexico, and the 
process of establishing a market economy here has become 
irreversible.  To date, Japan has qualified the idea of Hungary's 
admission to the OECD as premature and untimely.  Kadar called OECD 
membership an important prerequisite for Hungary's integration into 
Europe and the world economy.  Over the past few years, Japanese 
sales to Hungary have doubled, while Hungarian exports to Japan 
decreased, Kadar said.  Last year, Hungary's import of Japanese 
products increased by 30 percent, while Hungarian sales to Japan 
dropped by 13 percent.  In 1992, Hungary's trade deficit with Japan 
amounted to $165 million; in 1993 it rose to $259 million.  "This 
huge deficit cannot be maintained in the long run," the minister 
said.  Kadar criticized Japan for applying the Generalized System of 
Preferences (GSP) to only one-third of Hungarian deliveries and 
keeping the restrictions on Hungarian food exports in force. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1909 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   FARM SALES TO CZECH REPUBLIC MAY INCREASE:  Agricultural 
producers face no obstacles to increased sales to the Czech market, 
Agriculture Minister Janos Szabo said.  Hungary and the Czech 
Republic signed inter-governmental agreements on crop protection and 
veterinary cooperation.  (Budapest MTI in English 1605 GMT 9 Mar 94 
AU) 

   IKARUS BUSES TO THAILAND:  The Ikarus factory is to deliver 
chasses equipped with Mercedes engines and automatic transmissions 
for 50 articulated urban buses to Thailand this year.  The buses 
will be assembled in Thailand.  The Ikarus factory hopes to conclude 
further deals with Thailand, and a contract for the delivery of an 
addition 400 buses is expected.  The factory will also submit a bid, 
through a firm representing the Ikarus share company, for the 
delivery of 2,000 finished buses to be purchased in the framework of 
a Thai governmental program.  (Budapest MTI in English 1844 GMT 12 
Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIVATIZATION OF PHARMACEUTICAL INDUSTRY:  Although privatization 
of the pharmaceutical industry and trade began some years ago, the 
process has been hampered by legal disputes that will probably delay 
its completion until mid-1994.  The scheme involves six 
pharmaceutical companies, 20 wholesalers, and 1,300 pharmacies.  The 
pharmaceutical industry has always been an economic success story in 
Hungary.  Its privatization started back in 1989.  To date, the 
Chinoin, EGIS, Alkaloida, and Biogal companies have passed into 
private hands.  The government would prefer that small investors 
could also buy into these four firms, as well as into the Gedeon 
Richter Pharmaceutical Company and the Reanal Fine Chemicals 
Factory.  For this reason, investors have been allowed to buy shares 
for compensation coupons. 

   Shares of EGIS are currently the most sought after because the 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development has become one of 
the company's owners.  Shares of Alkaloida and Chinoin are also in 
keen demand.  (The French Sanofic company owns 91 percent of the 
latter firm.)  The transformation of the pharmaceutical marketplace 
started last autumn, with the assets at stake amounting to 30-40 
billion forints.  To date, 300 pharmacies have been privatized. 
Twenty wholesale firms and 1,300 or so pharmacies are still in state 
ownership.  Privatization of these should have started three years 
ago, but the question of who owns them is still unsettled.  The 
legal dispute stems from the fact that, although most of the 
wholesale and retail units were founded by local councils, the law 
on state assets put them under State Property Agency (AVU) control. 
Clarifying ownership rights is all the more important because it 
will determine whether revenues from privatization will go to the 
local authorities or the central budget. 

   AVU and Welfare Ministry experts prefer pharmaceutical 
wholesalers to be privatized by the AVU, which they say would 
provide standard principles for the privatization of retail units 
all over the country.  They argue that this option would increase 
the chances for the country's 4,500 pharmacists to buy pharmacies, 
thus giving professional considerations priority in the selection of 
future owners.  This option is also backed by the parmacists' 
interest associations.  In the meantime, pharmacists have been 
allowed to buy pharmacies for preferential state loans and 
compensation coupons.  While the legal dispute is still under way, 
the state monopoly on pharmaceutical trade has become a thing of the 
past.  There are currently 46 pharmaceutical wholesalers with 
nationwide networks in Hungary, including some of the world's 
biggest pharmaceutical manufacturers, such as the British Glaxo and 
U.S. Pfizer corporations.  (Budapest MTI in English 1107 GMT 10 Mar 
94 AU) 

   HUNGEXPO RT TO BE PRIVATIZED:  The State Property Management 
Corporation (AV Rt) is planning to reduce its present 84 percent 
stake in Hungexpo Rt to a single golden share.  Hungexpo, organizing 
trade fairs and publicity campaigns, has registered capital of 3.133 
billion forints, including a 38-hectare exhibition site valued at 
HUF2.8 billion.  The government earlier decided that the state would 
retain a long-term stake of 25 percent plus one vote in Hungexpo. 
Local councils currently hold the remaining 16 percent of the 
company.  A 51 percent stake is planned to be offered to 
professional investors and 49 percent will be privately offered to 
various Hungarian representative organizations, including the 
National Association of Hungarian Manufacturers, the Hungarian 
Chamber of Commerce, and the National Association of Entrepreneurs. 
The AV Rt propose the ownership of the exhibition site to be 
transferred to the local council with Hungexpo having a long-term 
lease on the site.  This proposal, however, has yet to be approved 
by the Ministry of International Economic Relations, the Ministry of 
Industry and Trade, and the main organizer of the 1996 Expo. 
Preliminary figures show that Hungexpo Rt had a net turnover of HUF2 
billion last year and the company's business activities showed a 
profit which had to be spent on covering its losses on financial 
transactions.  (Budapest MTI in English 1222 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT DECLINES IN FEBRUARY:  According to figures 
published by the National Labor Center, the registered number of 
unemployed declined by 11,000 in February, following a rise in 
January of 8,800, for a total of 630,600.  The unemployment rate was 
12.6 percent in February, as compared to January's 12.8 percent. 
The registered manpower demand rose again in February, and 4,000 
more vacancies were reported by employers than in January.  Most of 
the new job openings were in agriculture and construction. 
Nationwide vacancies stood at 64,600 in February.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 0816 GMT 9 Mar 94 ) 

   AUSTRIAN EU MEMBERSHIP SEEN AS FAVORABLE FOR HUNGARY:  According 
to the Ministry of International Economic Relations, Austria's 
membership of the EU, expected in January 1995, would be a favorable 
development for Hungary, as it would mean that Hungary had a 
neighboring EU country.  Following the expansion of the EU to 
include Austria and the Scandinavian EFTA (European Free Trade 
Association) countries, some 60 percent of Hungary's exports will go 
to the EU, as compared to 46.5 percent in 1993.  Hungary is 
Austria's fifth largest export market and accounts for more Austrian 
exports than the UK or the United States.  According to Austrian 
figures, exports to Hungary amounted to 16.5 billion Austrian 
shillings (ATS) last year, 6.4 percent up on 1992, while imports 
from Hungary, at ATS 10.8 billion, were 9.4 percent down.  Hungary 
has received 60 percent of all Austrian capital investment in 
Central and Eastern Europe.  Austria's EU membership will benefit 
Hungarian agricultural exports as the market regulations contained 
in Hungary's Association Agreement with the EU are more favorable 
than those in Hungary's trade agreement with the EFTA countries. 
(Budapest MTI in English 2143 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK PREPARES FOR BOND SALES TO FOREIGNERS:  The 
Hungarian National Bank (MNB) will prepare the conditions for the 
start of issuing state bonds available to foreigners.  The draft 
will contain the required amendments to the foreign exchange law. 
The MNB draft differs in certain aspects from the proposal on the 
system of foreign issues prepared by the Girocredit Befektetesi 
(Budapest) Rt (Girocredit Investment Rt), which was ordered by the 
Securities office of the Finance Ministry.  The Finance Ministry 
supposedly did not have any objections, as it announced two weeks 
ago that as soon as the necessary foreign exchange authority license 
is received from the MNB, it will commission Girocredit to arrange 
the first issue for foreigners, planned for March 28. 

   The details of the MNB draft have not been disclosed.  Although 
such issues may also be solved among current regulations, with 
bridging techniques, the MNB considers it rational to carry out the 
most important amendments in order to have an operable system that 
might be refined later.  After the amendments of legal regulations 
the first such issue may be in April, or May at the latest.  The 
majority of the amendments will probably affect decrees, which means 
that there is no need for lengthy parliamentary debate.  The issues 
may only be permitted by the MNB, as the foreign exchange authority. 
As the holder of such an authorization, the Finance Ministry decides 
on the commissioning of a manager for the issue.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1652 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   BUILDING INDUSTRY GREW SLIGHTLY IN 1993:  Output of the building 
industry sector rose by 62 billion forints (HUF) in 1993 to exceed 
HUF 241 billion, although growth in real terms was only 1.7 percent. 
Nonetheless, this compares to a drop of 0.2 percent in 1992, the 
most recent report of the Central Statistical Office (KSH) shows. 
1993 figures show that fewer -- but higher-value -- new buildings 
were constructed, and building renovation work fell by 8 percent, 
compared to 1992.  In the third quarter of 1993, output was 20 
percent higher than in the same period of 1992.  Installation work 
(including painting and decorating) accounts for 40 percent of the 
industry's production, construction for 28 percent, and civil 
engineering for 24 percent.  The share of building maintenance is a 
mere 7 percent.  The number of contracts fell slightly at the end of 
last year, though the value remained unchanged, another indication 
that demand for high-value buildings has begun to increase. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1640 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   DECLINE IN HOUSING STOCK:  Although 40,000 new flats should be 
built annually in order merely to maintain the existing housing 
stock, only half this number were built last year, according to a 
report by the AB Construction Information and Marketing Office.  In 
the building industry journal EPITESI PIAC, Denes Varga points out 
that the decline in house construction since 1990 has been steeper 
than expected.  The reason for this, he argues, is that people 
rushed to complete their houses as soon as possible because they 
felt that the economic situation would get even worse if they 
waited.  Another factor is the fact that potential house builders 
feared that VAT refunds on building materials would be abolished, a 
step eventually taken at the start of this year.  In the absence of 
a state housing program, the AB Office forecasts only a slight 
increase in housing starts in the next two years. 

BOT 
                Flats                       Cumulative Fall 
Year            Built    Forecast           in Housing Stock 
1990           43,771                            -1,229 
1991           33,164                           -13,065 
1992           25,807                           -32,258 
1993           20,913     22,000                -56,345 
1994                      23,000                -78,345 
1995                      28,000                -95,345 
Source:  EPITESI PIAC 

EOT 
(Budapest MTI in English 2147 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   BRITISH KNOW-HOW FUND'S AID DESCRIBED:  The Know-How Fund (KHF), 
set up by the British Government to help East-Central European 
reform, has contributed 6 million pounds sterling a year to the 
development of Hungary's market economy since 1990.  This year, two- 
thirds of the contribution will go to privatization, primarily to 
the Small Investors' Share Purchase (SISP) scheme.  In cooperation 
with the World Bank, the IMF, and other international organizations, 
the London-based KHF assists Hungary's transition to a market 
economy by transferring expertise.  Also, it has sent advisers to 
Hungary to survey the support required.  Unlike other aid 
organizations, the KHF does not provide direct financial assistance, 
but gives technical support up to 10 percent of the project costs. 
Given its limited resources, the fund focuses on the financial 
sphere, employment, small and medium-sized businesses, accounting, 
agricultural training, local authorities, and state administration, 
with courses and lectures held on banking, privatization, and book 
publishing and marketing. 

   The KHF helps the State Property Agency (AVU) in charge of 
privatization in selecting consultants for SISP, and is directly 
involved in privatization consultancy.  For instance, it advised an 
electricity company and a meat-processing firm in southern Hungary 
on implementing energy-saving schemes.  KHF support is available 
only for schemes backed by the government or its agencies.  The fund 
is expected to stay in Hungary for several years after completion of 
the privatization drive, aiding businesses in PR and marketing work. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1044 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLAND 

   POMERANIAN CREDIT BANK AGREEMENT WITH SCHONNER CAPITAL:  The 
Pomorski Bank Kredytowy SA (Pomeranian Credit Bank PBK) has signed 
an agreement on cooperation with the U.S. finance company Schonner 
Capital Corporation of Boston, PBK deputy president Jan Adamczyk 
announced on 17 March.  The agreement foresees that if the PBK or 
Boston company succeed in gaining management rights over one of the 
national investment funds, they will set up a joint venture.  "We 
also envisage help from Schonner in restructuring the companies 
financed by the PBK, plus exchanges of experience and cooperation in 
the organization of training," said Adamczyk.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1221 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   $200 MILLION DOLLAR TRADE DEFICIT IN JANUARY:  In January Poland 
recorded a foreign trade deficit of $200 million and a slightly 
smaller deficit in its current account in the balance of payments 
($191 million), according to data released by a Polish National Bank 
official.  Wlodzimierz Kicinski, head of the Bank's foreign 
department, told reporters that export earnings in January reached 
$1.054 trillion, up 21.6 percent on January 1993, while payments for 
imports reached $1.25 trillion, up 10 percent on January last year. 
Poland's leading trade partners both in exports and imports were 
Germany, the United States, Britain, France and Austria.   Gross 
official reserves of foreign exchange reached $4.3 trillion in 
January, recording a slight increase on December 1993.  The 
president of the State Foreign Investment Agency said he expected an 
inflow of foreign investment and loan capital to Poland as a result 
of the agreement signed by Poland with the creditor banks associated 
in the London Club.  He put the expected inflow at $1 trillion 
dollars annually.  In the last five years foreign investments in 
Poland have totalled $3.5 trillion dollars.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
1518 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIME MINISTERIAL COUNCIL DISCUSSES PRIVATIZATION:  The prime 
minister's Council for Privatization discussed a report on - 
privatization in the years 1990-1992 drafted by the Privatization 
Ministry. The report says that of 8,453 state firms existing at the 
end of 1990, 1,015 or 12.5 percent were privatized by the end of 
1992. Another 1,037 firms are in various stages of the privatization 
process.  In June last year there were still 6,037 state firms in 
Poland.  The report emphasizes the need for changing the 1990 law on 
privatization of state enterprises to encourage potential buyers and 
allow for employee representation on supervisory boards.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1907 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   BANKERS TRUST COMPANY OPENS OFFICE IN WARSAW:  The Bankers Trust 
Company, one of the world's major financial institutions servicing 
international corporations, private and public organisations and 
governmental institutions, opened its representation in Warsaw on 17 
March.  The company has been present in Poland since 1991 and 
received a license to open its office here from the Polish National 
Bank last November.  According to the director of the Warsaw office 
Stanislaw Popow, Bankers Trust will render consulting services in 
restructuring Polish enterprises and their merger with foreign 
firms.  It will help foreign investors finance projects in Poland 
through Polish or foreign banks operating in this country.  It will 
also help Polish firms in financing their investments in Poland and 
abroad.  It also plans to enter the Polish securities market.  For 
instance, as the owner of 16 percent of shares of the Amer-Bank. it 
intends to have it listed on the Warsaw stock exchange.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 2020 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLAND TO RECEIVE 30 MILLION ECU TO AID AGRICULTURE:  Poland will 
receive 30 million ECU in technical aid for the agricultural sector 
under a financial memorandum signed on 18 March by minister of 
agriculture and food economy Andrzej Smietanko and head of the 
mission of the European Commission in Warsaw Ambassador Alexander 
Dijckmeester.  The means will be earmarked to bring Polish 
agricultural policy into line with that of the European Union and 
create a capital guarantee fund.  Part of the aid will be directed 
to a fund supporting the restructuring of state farms.  Ambassador 
Dijckmeester said Western Europe is interested in the successful end 
of transformations in Poland's agriculture.  He added that Western 
Europe realizes that Polish agriculture will have to face a number 
of problems experienced by western countries in past decades. 
Minister Smietanko hoped that the Polish experts preparing new 
projects will be able to take greater advantage of their experience 
regarding market economy which they have gained while cooperating 
with western experts.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1435 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH-RUSSIAN BUSINESS CENTER TO BE SET UP IN SOPOT:  The first 
Baltic economic forum ended its debates in Sopot on 19 March with 
the signing of a declaration calling for the creation of a Polish- 
Russian business center in that town.  The Center, to be set up this 
year, will include a bank, goods exchange and Russian business 
agencies.  A branch of the Centre is to be established in 
Kaliningrad.  The declaration was signed by Russian Ambassador Yuri 
Kashlev and Deputy Minister for Foreign Economic Relations Zbigniew 
Okonski, which attests to the fact that the initiative does not 
merely cover cooperation between Gdansk and Kaliningrad, but is of a 
broader character.  Gdansk provincial governor Maciej Plazynski told 
a press conference that the Centre was established to intensify the 
whole of Polish-Russian relations.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1841 GMT 
19 Mar 94 AU) 

   FEBRUARY ECONOMIC STATISTICS: Industrial production in February 
1994 stayed at the level of the previous month, but it was 12.2 
percent higher than in February 1993, according to data of the 
Central Statistical Office (GUS) released on 21 March.  A certain 
slow-down was recorded in the rate of inflation and unemployment 
grew only slightly in February, GUS deputy chairman Roman Sawinski 
told a press conference in Warsaw.  These positive trends enable one 
to consider February a "good month for the economy," he said. 
However, the budget deficit amounted to 8.9 trillion zlotys (some 
$410 million after the first two months of the present year.  The 
prices of consumer goods and services grew by 1.1 percent in 
February while in the first two months of 1994 they grew by 2.9 
percent.  These are very optimistic results compared to last year's 
figures of 7.6 percent and 9.4 percent respectively, Sawinski said. 

   This inconspicuous growth of prices is first of all the effect of 
stabilization on the food market.  The prices of foodstuffs went up 
by a mere 0.2 percent in February.  The highest rises were 
introduced in the prices of postal services (20 percent), 
pharmaceuticals (2.9 percent) and clothes (2.6 percent).  Real wages 
were higher in February by 0.8 percent than in the preceding month 
and by 0.3 higher than in February 1993.  The average net wage in 
the industrial sector amounted to 3.8 million zlotys.  A growth of 
production was recorded in February in 26 of the 29 industrial 
sectors.  The mining industry had the poorest results with 
production slumping by 6.4 percent.  Unsatisfactory results were 
also recorded in housing construction and especially in its 
cooperative and communal sector, where 28 percent less flats were 
handed over for use than in February 1993. 

   The unemployment rate amounted to 16.1 percent in February.  The 
number of newly registered unemployed amounted to 13,700, compared 
to 69,500 in January of this year.  In February, state budget 
revenue amounted to 43.7 trillion zlotys and expenditures to 52.1 
trillion zlotys.  The budget deficit after the first two months of 
the present year amounted to 10.7 percent of the figure envisaged in 
the budget law for 1994.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1458 GMT 21 Mar 94 
AU) 

   FIRST SKODA CARS TO BE ASSEMBLED IN POLAND IN MAY:  The assembly 
of the Favorit and Forman models of Skoda cars, to be carried out by 
the Volkswagen-Poznan Ltd. company, will start at Antoninek near 
Poznan this May, company chairman Eberhard Klaus said on 21 March. A 
total of 5,000 cars are to be assembled this year.  He added that 
the Skoda-Volkswagen factory in Mlada Boleslav in the Czech Republic 
would cover the expenses of assembling cars at Antoninek and that 
some parts would be produced in Poland.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1546 
GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   FINANCIAL EXPERTS DISCUSS LOCAL GUARANTEE FUNDS:  Hubert 
Szlaszewski, general director of the Cooperation Fund, said that the 
setting up of a system of local guarantee funds is the best way to 
take advantage of the money offered by the PHARE (Economic and 
reconstruction aid for Poland and Hungary) program of the European 
Union as well funds from Polish banks earmarked to support Polish 
small businesses.  Opening a two-day international seminar in 
Madralin outside Warsaw, Szlaszewski said that such funds would 
guarantee banks the repayment of credits granted by them to small 
Polish enterprises possessing economic development prospects.  The 
conference is attended by representatives of the Union of Polish 
Banks and 15 agencies dealing with local and regional development, 
including 9 agencies linked with the PHARE program of local 
initiatives and foreign guests.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1858 GMT 21 
Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH-FRENCH CONFERENCE ON UNEMPLOYMENT:  Unemployment lasting 
longer than 12 months poses the biggest threat to the Polish economy 
as it affects some 3 million people in Poland and might push them in 
the direction of the margin of society, it was said at the 
inauguration of the Polish-French conference on unemployment in 
Krakow on 21 March.  The conference was organized by the Foundation 
of Christian Culture, the Krakow-based Club of Catholic 
Intelligentsia, and the French Catholic Committee for Combating 
Starvation.  It is a most urgent task for trade unions, employers, 
non- government organizations and local government bodies to provide 
possibilities of employment for people, stressed a Polish delegate. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 2007 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   WESTERN INVESTORS SEEK TO BUILD HOTELS, SUPERMARKETS:  Western 
investors were interested in the possibilities of participation in 
the construction of hotels, car parks and supermarkets in Poland, at 
the international real estate and investments fair Mipim 94 in 
Cannes.  They were surprised at Polish banks' lack of interest in 
these remunerative undertakings, Poznan deputy mayor Jacek May said 
on 21 March.  According to Jacek May, the investors stressed the 
importance of a feeling of legal and economic stability in the 
countries of future investments.  They agreed, however, that the 
transaction procedures in western countries take as much time as in 
Poland.  Jacek May said that the participation of our cities in such 
events might help to reach potential serious investors and capital 
groups directly, without middlemen.  Other big polish cities like 
Bydgoszcz, Gdansk, Warsaw, Szczecin and Wroclaw were also 
represented at the fair.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2045 GMT 21 Mar 94 
AU) 

   ZLOTY DENOMINATION TO BEGIN AS SCHEDULED:  The denomination of 
the zloty is to begin in January 1995 in accordance with earlier 
adopted plans, president of the Polish National Bank Hanna 
Gronkiewicz-Waltz said.  She added that the recent unfortunate 
statement by Deputy Finance Minister Witold Modzelewski whereby it 
was too early to denominate the zloty, had neither been agreed with 
her nor with the prime minister.  Ms Gronkiewicz-Waltz declared that 
the denomination meant that four zeros would be slashed so that 
10,000 present zlotys would be equal to one new zloty.  She also 
explained that both the old and new banknotes would be used during 
the two years following the introduction of denomination.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1214 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   TELECOMMUNICATIONS FAIR OPENS IN LODZ:  Some 170 exhibitors from 
Poland, Germany, Britain, the United States and Austria are taking 
part in the Intertelecom 94 international communications fair that 
opened in Lodz on 22 March.  The offer by such renowned firms as 
AT&amp;T, Kapsch, Alcatel, Siemens and Mikrotel features various kinds 
of faxes, monitors, cellular telephones, computer-controlled 
automatic telephone exchanges, laser printers, the latest generation 
of video-telephones, control-measuring equipment, and other devices. 
Journalists learned at a press conference that the number of 
telephones in Poland, a country with the population close to 40 
million, has increased by 25 percent over the past three years and 
amounts to 4.5 million now, but about two million Poles are still on 
the waiting list for a telephone.  The modernization of domestic 
telecommunications to meet European standards will take about five 
years.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1610 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH, ITALIAN REGIONS AGREE ON COOPERATION:  Representatives of 
Lower Silesia and the Italian region of Emilia-Romagna have agreed 
to sign a cooperation agreement in Wroclaw this fall, Wroclaw 
Province Governor Janusz Zaleski, visiting the Italian city of 
Modena to promote Wroclaw Province, said on 22 March. Members of the 
Polish delegation took part in a seminar in Modena during which they 
outlined regulations concerning foreign investments in Poland.  A 
series of lectures was followed by a round-table meeting of 
representatives of some 20 firms and economic organizations from 
Lower Silesia and representatives of almost 150 Italian firms. 
Tomasz Bartoszewicz, commercial counselor at the Polish Embassy in 
Rome, said that the meeting was a success as it was the first time 
that such an event had been attended by so many Italian businessmen. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1828 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   SZCZECIN TO RECEIVE NEW AIRPORT:  Representatives of the Szczecin 
provincial and municipal authorities and the local flying club 
signed an agreement opening the way for the setting up of the West 
Pomerania Aviation Corporation, director of the Szczecin Flying Club 
Janusz Tatarczuk said.  The company plans to open a new airport by 
modernizing the existing sports airfield in Szczecin-Dabie which 
would be able to receive small passenger and cargo planes.  Szczecin 
already has an airport for regular domestic flights in Goleniow, 
about 60 km north-east of the city center.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
2019 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   BRITISH BUSINESSMEN INTERESTED IN COOPERATION:  Representatives 
of nine firms from Somerset in southwest England paid a visit to 
Poland on March 19.  They are interested in exporting their products 
to Poland and establishing joint ventures with Polish businessmen, 
the British Embassy in Warsaw said on 24 March.  The businessmen 
represent firms carrying out language training, construction 
enterprises specializing in producing steel roof systems, and 
factories manufacturing printers, computers, and tunnelling 
equipment.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1427 GMT 24 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH-BRITISH TRADE UP 22 PERCENT:  Polish-British trade 
turnover went up by 22 percent last year compared to 1992, reaching 
a value of some 1.2 billion British pounds.  Non-ferrous metals and 
coal head the list of Polish top products exported to Britain last 
year.  Poland also exported steel, iron and textiles.  The total 
value of Polish exports to Britain reached 449 million pounds in 
1993, going up by 26.2 percent compared to the previous year.  Apart 
from crude oil and petroleum products, all other products imported 
by Poland from Britain are highly processed products. Their imports 
to Poland went up 80 percent last year.  The total value of Poland's 
1993 imports from Britain reached 717 million pounds, increasing 
18.5 percent against 1993.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1534 GMT 25 Mar 
94 AU) 

   AIRCRAFT EXPORTED TO ITALY NO LONGER NEED CERTIFICATES: Twenty 
"Dromader" planes, to be exported by the Polish aviation industry to 
Italy this year, will no longer need certificates necessary to fly 
in that' country.  The aviation industry no longer has any export 
limits, Minister of Transport and Maritime Economy Boguslaw 
Liberadzki said on 24 March.  Main civil aviation inspector Adam 
Berezowski and director of the aviation department at the Italian 
Transport Ministry Marco Benvenuti signed a Polish-Italian agreement 
at the Ministry of Transport and Maritime Economy in Warsaw to 
mutually recognize aviation certificates.  So far, Poland has signed 
similar agreements with the United States, Canada and Colombia, and 
talks are under way on signing similar accords with Russia and CIS. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1556 GMT 24 Mar 94 AU) 

   SEJM COMMITTEE APPROVES PHARE PROGRAM IMPLEMENTATION:  The Sejm 
Social Policy Committee positively assessed the implementation so 
far of the EC Commission's PHARE (Economic Restruction Aid for 
Poland and Hungary) 90 and PHARE 91.  The deputies considered as 
particularly significant the programme of social and economic 
development set up to promote local initiatives for employment and 
development of rural areas.  Nine selected areas will receive grants 
amounting to 6 million ECUs.  The Committee agreed that the Labor 
Ministry should continue negotiations with the EC Commission on the 
continuation of the projects so far on a broader scale.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 1758 GMT 24 Mar 94 AU) 

   JAPANESE GOVERNMENT SUPPLIES TV TRAINING CENTER: The Polish 
Television Training Center, furnished with modern Japanese equipment 
opened in Warsaw on 25 March.  The center is to train some 300 
people annually.  Equipment for the production of studio programs 
and an editing set, worth some $350,000, was a gift of the Japanese 
Government for the center.  The Japanese side declared further 
technical aid, including a visit of Japanese experts to Poland and 
the training of Polish experts in Japan.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
1342 GMT 25 Mar 94 AU) 

   THREE-TIER STRUCTURE PROPOSED FOR COOPERATIVE BANKS:  Systemic 
and structural transformations creating the foundations of the safe 
operation of cooperative banks are a precondition for increasing 
their capital, the president of the National Bank of Poland (NBP) 
Hanna Gronkiewicz-Waltz told a general meeting of members of the 
National Union of Cooperative Banks in Wroclaw on 25 March. 

   She expressed the opinion that it is necessary to form a uniform, 
three-tier organizational structure of cooperative banks.  The 
cooperative banks should be grouped in some 10 regional banks and 
these, in turn, should be grouped in a national bank (bank krajowy), 
the NPB president said.  She explained that the cooperative banks 
would function in this system as independent and self-governed 
organizational units operating on the basis of uniform principles 
common for all the banks grouped in a given regional bank.  The 
regional banks would function as joint stock companies in which each 
of the shareholders would have one vote.  They would ensure the 
servicing of the cooperative banks grouped in them. 

   Ms Gronkiewicz-Waltz stressed that the Bank Krajowy would ensure 
a uniform policy of a given group of banks and coherent management 
of its resources, and would also be responsible for the correct 
functioning of all the groups of cooperative banks.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1500 GMT 25 Mar 94 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENT TOPS $3.5 BILLION:  The value of all foreign 
investments finalized in Poland reached $2.5 billion at the start of 
October last year, increasing to over $3.5 billion in March 1994, 
according to sources at the State Foreign Investments Agency.  U.S., 
Italian, German and French firms and international corporations are 
the largest investors in Poland.  They include Fiat, Coca-Cola, the 
Polish-American Enterprise Fund, Thomson, IPC, the European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development, International Finance Corporation, 
ABB, Curtis International, and Unilever.  There are some 16,000 
joint-ventures and foreign companies in Poland, including over 200 
large investors whose investments exceeded or are to exceed $1 
million.  Most foreign investments focus on the production of 
consumer goods demanding simple technology. 

   Most of the foreign investments are made in Warsaw Province, 
where 38 firms have invested some $800 million.  Katowice and Krakow 
regions were also favored by foreign businessmen.  Until now, 
foreign capital was invested chiefly in such branches as 
construction, car industry, food-processing and electronics. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1642 GMT 25 Mar 94 AU) 

   COCOM LIFTS EXPORT RESTRICTIONS:  The Council of the Coordinating 
Committee for East-West Trade Policy (COCOM) has lifted export 
restrictions imposed on Poland.  The decision was made in connection 
with the coming into force of the law on the principles of special 
control over foreign trade in commodities and know-how on 25 March, 
the Foreign Ministry said.  The long-term efforts of Polish 
diplomacy to gain free access to advanced Western know-how scored 
success.  This decision should result in further improvement in 
Poland's economic cooperation with states having the latest know- 
how, the Foreign Ministry's press and information department said. 
According to the Ministry, the COCOM decision is also of political 
significance, showing recognition for Poland's active and 
responsible policy in the non-proliferation of mass destruction 
weapons and facilitating Poland's integration strivings.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1950 GMT 25 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH-CHINESE ECONOMIC COMMISSION ON COOPERATION PROSPECTS:  The 
seventh session of the Polish-Chinese inter-governmental commission 
for economic and trade cooperation, held in Beijing on 28 March, 
sized up the state and prospects for the development of bilateral 
economic cooperation.  On the Polish side, the session was chaired 
by Transport Minister Boguslaw Liberadzki and on the Chinese side by 
Foreign Trade Minister Wu Yi.  The commission, which met for the 
first time in 1991, assessed positively the renewed rise in Polish- 
Chinese trade over the past three years.  Last year, this trade 
amounted to $397 million according to Poland, and $472 million 
dollars according to China, and was higher by 125 percent as 
compared with 1992.  The protocol signed by the Commission  shows 
that mining, power, aviation, electronic, light, chemical and food 
processing industries and transport offer the greatest opportunities 
for the development of Polish-Chinese economic cooperation.  Working 
groups are to seek concrete possibilities of cooperation in these 
areas.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2012 GMT 28 Mar 94 AU) 

   LOCAL GOVERNMENT ORGANIZATIONS TO FIGHT UNEMPLOYMENT:  The state 
is unable to solve the problem of unemployment on it own, and 
therefore local government agencies, funds and private businesses 
will have to play a greater role in fighting it, head of the Central 
Office of Planning (CUP) Miroslaw Pietrewicz told a conference 
entitled "local initiatives in solving the problems of 
unemployment."  He stressed that the scaling down of actions by the 
state does not mean that the government is giving up the problem, 
but, he claimed, its role should be to integrate local initiatives. 
"Within the next four years, we plan to reduce the unemployment rate 
from 16.5 percent in 1994 to 13.5 percent in 1997.  Assuming that 
the number of economically active persons in that period will rise 
by 620,000, over 1.1 million new jobs should be created by 1997," 
Pietrewicz explained. 

   Representatives of local government organizations emphasized that 
unsatisfactory efficiency in combating unemployment is caused by a 
scarcity of rural district funds and inaccurate legal regulations on 
the labor market.  It is necessary for the central administration to 
more actively cooperate with local organizations in fighting 
unemployment, they argued.  Districts hit with structural 
unemployment need the state's assistance.  The state, it was said, 
may help by finding prospective investors, creating economic 
initiatives, setting up economic databases and increasing the labor 
fund's means for active forms of combating unemployment.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1614 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   SZCZECIN SHIPYARD SIGNS CONTRACT WITH CHILEAN SHIPOWNER:  The 
Szczecin shipyard signed a contract with Compania Chile de 
Navegacion Interoceanica for the construction of two sophisticated 
container ships of 22,900 DWT each.  The two ships are to delivered 
in the fourth quarter of 1995 in addition to four other vessels to 
be conveyed to the Chilean customer next year.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1628 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   HIGHWAYS CONSORTIUM SET UP IN GDANSK:  Eight founding members, 
including the Gdansk refinery, the port of Gdansk, and Bank Gdanski, 
have set up a consortium with the aim of participating in the 
construction of motorways in Poland, and especially the north-south 
trans-European motorway, head of the Transport Department of the 
Provincial Government in Gdansk, Jerzy Stefanski, announced on 10 
March.  The consortium, called "Autostrady Gdanskie" ("Gdansk 
Motorways"), intends to focus on the construction of the Gdansk- 
Torun section of the north-south motorway.  Part of this strategic 
10,000 km long motorway, constructed under the aegis of the UN 
Economic Commission for Europe, is ready and the greatest delays in 
its construction have occurred on the territory of Poland.  However, 
the consortium has to obtain credits if it wants to apply to the 
state authorities for a license to carry out investment activity. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1748 GMT 10 Mar 94 AU) 

   EUROPEAN UNION TO INVESTIGATE POLISH ENTREPRENEURSHIP:  The 
European Foundation for Entrepreneurship Research (EFER) will 
examine the 150 most dynamic companies in Poland, the Czech 
Republic, Hungary, Slovakia, and Slovenia, EFER President Bert 
Twaalhoven told reporters in Warsaw on 11 March.  The research is 
aimed at defining the needs of the best companies and setting up a 
data bank covering 750 of the most dynamic enterprises in central 
Europe.  The research will focus on private firms whose turnover 
exceeded 1 million ECU in 1993 and whose production growth was 
higher than the growth of the GDP (about 4 percent).  The firms 
should employ at least 10 people and their products should be 
innovative and partly exported. 

   The research is financed by the PHARE (Economic Reconstruction 
Aid for Poland and Hungary) project and its results will be 
presented to the European Union Commission.  The research will help 
to suggest to central European governments what steps they should 
take to support entrepreneurship.  The Polish part of the program is 
supported by the Business Centre Club, Polish Business Council, 
Confederation of Polish Employers, and Bank Rozwoju Eksportu (Export 
Development Bank).  The foundation, set up in 1987, groups 
scientists, financiers and entrepreneurs.  In future, EFER wants to 
carry out similar research in the republics of the former Soviet 
Union and hopes that the 750 dynamic companies from eastern Europe 
will set a pattern for them.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1807 GMT 10 Mar 
94 AU) 

   LONDON CLUB CUTS POLISH DEBT:  After four years of tough 
negotiations, Poland and the London Club reached an agreement in 
Frankfurt on 11 March on a 45 percent reduction of the $13.2-billion 
Polish debt to Western commercial banks.  The repayment of the debt 
is to last 30 years but the annual payment is not to exceed $400 
million.  The agreement covers all elements of the debt, including 
overdue interest. (Warsaw PAP in English 1514 GMT 11 Mar 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK PRESIDENT URGES BANKS TO MERGE:  The Polish banking 
system needs to change due to the development of free market 
mechanisms.  "The consolidation of banks in order to increase their 
capitals is the most important thing now," president of the National 
Bank of Poland Hanna Gronkiewicz-Waltz told a seminar on 12 March. 
According to Gronkiewicz-Waltz, only big and strong banks with 
capital exceeding 1 trillion zlotys ($46 million) will be able to 
compete efficiently with foreign financial institutions.  She also 
pointed to the fact that banks are unwilling to merge and mergers 
happen only when the situation of a bank worsens.  Only then does 
the bank look for a partner that would help it to overcome problems. 
Gronkiewicz-Waltz sees the opportunity for smaller banks to operate 
as well but they should specialize in some kind of services or work 
in certain fields of economy. 

   President of the Polish Banks Union Marian Krzak does not 
consider the present situation of banks as bad.  Current 
difficulties concern only 10-15 per cent of banks and so far none of 
them has been liquidated, he said.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1705 GMT 
11 Mar 94 AU) 

   INDUSTRIAL LOBBY TO SET UP IN ALL INDUSTRIAL CENTERS:  The 
coordinator of the Polish Industrial Lobby, Pawel Soroka, announced 
in Warsaw that its branches would be established in all industrial 
centers of the country and cooperation started with similar 
movements throughout Europe.  On Saturday (12 March), the industrial 
lobby celebrated the first anniversary of its operation.  According 
to representatives of the lobby, it is essential to create an 
industrial and pro-innovative policy favoring structural changes in 
industry and enterprises.  Conditions for a rise in the 
effectiveness, competitiveness on foreign markets and equity 
accumulation should be created for enterprises through a relaxation 
of taxes and lowering interests on investment credits, Soroka said. 
The Polish Industrial Lobby, established in Warsaw in March 1993, 
affiliates scientists, employers and representatives of trade 
unions.  Its goal is to influence industrial policy of the state and 
take part in its implementation.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1959 GMT 12 
Mar 94 AU) 

   WARSAW-LONDON FLIGHTS RESUME AFTER 4-MONTH BREAK:  Flights on the 
Warsaw-London route were resumed after over four months when a 
passenger plane of LOT Polish Airlines left Warsaw for London on 
Sunday (13 March) morning.  Direct flights between Warsaw and London 
were suspended on 31 October 1993 as a result of a dispute between 
LOT and British Airways caused by the British carrier's demand that 
the number of its flights on the route be doubled during the winter 
season.  Under an agreement reached earlier this month, the two 
carriers have been allotted nine flights a week each during the 
winter season ending in March, and 12 flights a week during the 
summer season.  Three additional flights are to be added in the 
period from June to August.  The Polish carrier will also operate 
some London flights from Krakow and Gdansk. 

   According to LOT's marketing director Marek Serafin, each airline 
will have 10 flights weekly during the next winter season and two 
additional flights for each of the carriers are possible in case of 
good performance.  LOT commercial manager Jan Mich said that the 
airline had lost around $1 million in ticket revenues as a result of 
the  war  with British Airways, but added that actual losses would 
be smaller when operating expenses are deducted.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1920 GMT 13 Mar 94 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT RISES 0.5 PERCENT IN FEBRUARY:  In February the 
unemployment rate rose by half a percent over the January figure. 
There are some 2,972,809 people unemployed nationally, which equals 
16.1 percent of all those employed.  In February, unemployment rose 
in 37 provinces and dropped in 8.  February saw a slow-down in the 
tempo of the increase of unemployment.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1219 
GMT 14 Mar 94 AU) 

   EU GRANTS TOTAL EIGHT MILLION ECUS:  Polish minister of industry 
and trade Marek Pol and ambassador of the European Union to Poland 
Alexander Dijckmeester on 14 March signed a financial memorandum on 
the granting to Poland by the European Union Commission of 1 million 
ECU to modernize a laboratory base of the State Trade Inspection 
Office and an agreement on Poland's further participation in the 
FIESTA program.  Under the agreement, Poland will receive 7 million 
ECU, 3 million of which are to be spent on the restructuring of the 
fuel and power industries and 4 million for similar operations in 
other industrial branches.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1419 GMT 14 Mar 
94 AU) 

   TEN MILLION ECUS FOR EDUCATION REFORM:  Poland is to receive 10 
million ECUs from the European Union for the reform of its 
educational system.  A memorandum to this effect was signed in 
Warsaw on 16 March by the minister of education Aleksander Luczak 
and head of the Warsaw mission of the EU Commission Alexander 
Dijckmeester.  The TERM (Training for the Management of Educational 
Reform) is to last till the end of 1996 and help improve the 
managerial abilities of Polish educators and school administrators. 
It is planned that some 1,500 workers of edcuational establishments 
will be trained under the program.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1518 GMT 
16 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRICES, INCOMES RISE IN FEBRUARY:  Consumer prices rose by an 
average of 1.1 percent in February compared with January, according 
to data released by the Central Statistical Office (GUS) on 15 
March.  GUS said in its communique that in January prices had risen 
by 1.8 percent.  Earnings rose by an average of 1.7 percent 
reaching, 4,718,400 zlotys (almost $300) a month.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1545 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   VOLVO TRUCK ASSEMBLY PLANT OPENS IN WROCLAW:  An assembly plant 
of Volvo trucks was officially opened on 15 March at the Jelcz car 
plant in Jelcz-Laskowice, near Wroclaw.  The new plant employs 30 
people assembling Volvo FL 6 trucks and FH 12 truck tractors from 
parts delivered by Sweden.  Plans call for increasing the number of 
employees to some 100 people.  The Volvo Truck Poland company has 
already received orders for 100 Volvo FH 12 truck tractors and is 
planning to sell some 500 tractors in Poland this year.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 1720 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   GERMAN INVESTMENT EXPECTED TO INCREASE:  One of the founders of 
the Polish-German Chamber of Commerce, Hans Juergen Weber, told a 
conference in Gliwice on 15 March that "the present government, 
formed by the two biggest parliamentary parties, guarantees 
increased German investments in Poland."   Weber was speaking at a 
meeting entitled "foreign investments and the role of trade unions." 
Weber thought that an unstable system of regulations, for instance 
in customs, discouraged foreign business people from investing in 
Poland.  He said that the Germans were investing much more in 
Hungary and the Czech Republic than in Poland.  "It is said that 
Germans invest a lot in Poland.  However in 1993 the United States 
was twice as far ahead of us in this area," he added.  Theddaus 
Schape, director of the Office for the Friedrich Ebert Foundation, 
said that the meeting had been organized together with the Lower 
Silesian region of Solidarity because "if the trade unions do not 
back the economic changes in Poland, then these changes will not 
succeed." (Warsaw PAP in English 1723 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   INTERNATIONAL TENDER FOR ROAD MODERNIZATION CLOSES:  As much as 
34 tenders have been bid for modernizing eight branch roads off some 
of Poland's main highways.  Bidding closed on 14 March, and the 
committee for tenders immediately began evaluating the tenders, 
according to information from committee chairman Jerzy Sulot. 
Twenty-eight Polish firms and ten foreign companies have entered 
bids either on their own or as joint ventures.  The world bank is to 
provide loans for the road construction.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
1857 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   ENTERPRISES SHOW IMPROVED FINANCIAL RESULTS IN 1993:  The 
financial situation of enterprises improved last year compared to 
their situation in 1992, according to data released by CUP.  This 
trend applied to both public and private firms, although the former 
showed stronger improvement than the latter, reporters were told at 
a press conference.  The best results in 1993 were recorded by 
Poczta Polska (Polish Post) and Telekomunikacja SA.  The latter had 
a profitability rate of 36.5 percent after 11 months of 1993.  At 
the end of 1993 publicly owned enterprises accounted for 36 percent 
of the total number of firms in Poland, while privately owned units 
accounted for 64 percent.  In both sectors, almost 42 percent of 
firms were in the red.  Total financial obligations of all firms 
amounted to 520 trillion zlotys (approximately $20 billiion) at the 
end of 1993.  The number of firms which lost creditworthiness 
increased from 4,400 in 1992 to 5,800 last year.  (LD1603184294 AU) 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1753 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   RESEARCH CENTER URGES TOBACCO INDUSTRY PRIVATIZATION:  Janusz 
Lewandowski of Market Economy Research Institute said that the 
postponement of the privatization and modernization of cigarette 
plants is reducing the competitiveness of state-owned plants and 
indirectly harming Polish tobacco growers.  The institute also 
expressed the opinion that the domestic market should be protected 
through the introduction of customs on imported tobacco.  The state 
tobacco industry produced 85 billion cigarettes last year.  However 
its share in the market supply of tobacco products has been 
declining for several years now while private cigarrette plants have 
been increasing their production.  Last year, private firms, 
including those with foreign capital, produced almost 5 billion 
cigarettes.  Lewandowski said that further delay in the 
privatization of the state-owned tobacco plants may cause that they 
will be "pushed out" of the Polish market and thus the interests of 
workers of those plants and tobacco growers may be endangered. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1901 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   ECOLOGICAL FUND TO SUPPORT INVESTMENT PROJECTS:  The council of 
the "Ekofundusz" Ecological Fund has approved 16 new investment 
projects to improve environment protection, says Maciej Nowicki, the 
Fund's president, adding that they would receive financial support 
from the Fund.  Nowicki said that the funds at the disposal of 
"Ekofundusz" represent 10 percent of the ecoconversion of the Polish 
debt towards banks gathered in the Paris Club.  So far, the United 
States, France, Switzerland and Finland agreed to such form of debt 
reduction.  "Ekofundusz" has earmarked 327 billion zlotys (some $15 
million) for the implementation of 25 eco-related projects between 
November 1992 and the end of 1993.  This year, "Ekofundusz" will 
support projects linked with the protection of the Baltic Sea, 
endangered birds, and the limitation of emission of gases.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1903 GMT 16 Mar 94 AU) 

   THOMSON-POLKOLOR GAINS ISO 9000 CERTIFICATE:  Thomson-Polkolor, 
Poland's largest manufacturer of TV picture tubes at Piaseczno, 
south of Warsaw, received an ISO 9000 certificate, which means that 
production quality management meets international standards.  The 
certificate covers four factories, producing seven groups of 
product.  Thomson-Polkolor chose 150 9000, the internationally 
recognized quality system, particularly respected by customers from 
the EU, in order to ensure better quality standards of its products. 
Thomson-Polkolor is a Franco-Polish company set up in the second 
half of 1991.  Thomson Tubes and Displays, a branch of the Thomson 
consumer electronics company specializing in the production of TV 
picture tubes, has 51 percent of shares in the enterprise.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1629 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   U.S.-POLISH ECONOMIC RELATIONS ASSESSED:  Despite a growing trade 
deficit, Polish-U.S. economic relations in 1993 were marked by 
progress and augured well for subsequent years, according to the 
Polish economic counselor's office in Washington.  Exports from 
Poland to the U.S. market reached $454 million, 21 percent more than 
in 1992.   the major export items being glass products and men's 
clothing.  U.S. exports to Poland increased by 44 percent and 
amounted to $916.5 million, leaving a trade deficit of $462.5 
million. 

   The officials from the Polish economic counselor's office believe 
that especially important for the future development of bilateral 
relations are growing U.S. direct investments in Poland, especially 
by large corporations, a significant increase in the volume of 
bilateral trade, and the setting up of new institutions of trade 
promotion and development.  The United States was among the five 
biggest Polish trade partners last year.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
2257 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   BYDGOSZCZ COMMUNAL BANK FREEZES WITHDRAWALS:  The Bydgoski Bank 
Komunalny (Bydgoszcz Communal Bank), which was besieged by clients 
withdrawing their deposits 4 March, closed down operation of its 
teller positions and froze cash withdrawals at all the bank's 
branches nationwide on Friday.  Bank President Wojciech Malinowski 
said that to continue allowing withdrawals would threaten the bank's 
interests, as it paid out some 60 billion zlotys (about $2.7 
million) during Thursday's panic wave.  According to Malinowski, the 
panic was caused by clients being inadequately informed about the 
accusations leveled against the bank by the Bydgoszcz branch of the 
Supreme Chamber of Inspection (NIK), which has forwarded a complaint 
of mismanagement against the bank to the Prosecutor's Office.  NIK 
has been in consultation with the Prosecutor's Office. 

   The bank's management will reveal only that the controversy is 
centered on bad credits granted in what it terms "the distant past." 
The Bydgoszcz bank has been in existence since 1989 and 90 percent 
of the credits in question were granted in 1990-1991, 3 percent of 
the 3.6 trillion zlotys ($164 million) the bank has granted to date. 
Malinowski announced that prior to Thursday's panic, clients had 
been withdrawing funds for some 10 days.  In his opinion the 
freezing of withdrawals was absolutely necessary, because otherwise 
the bank would find itself in even greater trouble than at present. 
The bank is still offering transfer and brokerage services. 
Malinowski stated that the bank requires at least 150 billion zlotys 
to maintain its financial liquidity.  "At this point we can count 
only on our own activity and the help of the Polish National Bank," 
he said.  "For the moment, the national bank has requested a full 
financial analysis."  Negotiations on a financing agreement with the 
Pierwszy Bank Komercyjny (First Commercial Bank) have produced no 
concrete results.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1821 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

  SEMINAR ON PHARE ASSISTANCE:  Experts and government officials 
from Poland and the EU have held a three-day seminar in Warsaw, 
which sized up the results of assistance offered to Poland under the 
PHARE (Economic Reconstruction Aid for Poland and Hungary) program. 
The Polish side emphasized the need to transform the PHARE fund to 
adjust it to the new conditions that have emerged since Poland's 
association with the EU.  The Polish delegates also wanted PHARE to 
lend greater support in the form of investments.  The delegates from 
the EU union declared their understanding for the Polish postulates 
concerning a simplification of procedures used by PHARE.  The 
conclusions reached by the participants in the seminar will be 
submitted to the European Commission in Brussels.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 2149 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   CENTRAL STATISTICAL OFFICE GETS 12 MILLION ECU PHARE AID:  Under 
the terms of a financial memorandum signed on 9 March, the Central 
Statistical Office (GUS) will receive 12 million ECU in aid within 
the PHARE program to develop the "Polstat" system of statistical 
information.  GUS chairman Jozef Olenski said that the program's aim 
will be to facilitate and accelerate the modernization of the 
economy, whose rapid changes require access to a wide spectrum of 
reliable economic and social data.  When implemented, "Polstat" will 
help GUS better carry out its tasks.  GUS needs a more efficient 
computer system in Warsaw and all provincial offices to carry out a 
necessary modernization of a system of data processing and 
transmitting.  Some 300 users should be able to have access 
simultaneously to the computer database.  Olenski added that the 
PHARE funds will be chiefly earmarked for the modernization of 
computer hardware and software, implementation of a modern 
methodology of statistical research, and upgrading the skills of GUS 
staff.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1359 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   ROMANIA 

   ROMANIA'S FOREST RESERVES:  Romania's forest stock currently 
covers an area of 6,367 thousand hectares, which is 28 percent of 
the country's total area, according to the National Statistics 
Board. This area has been roughly the same since 1938.  There are 
forest areas in all counties of the country, with a share ranging 
from 4 percent in Calarasi County (southwestern Romania) to 50 
percent in Suceava County (northeastern Romania).  A total of 
13,310.5 thousand cubic meters of wood was cut in 1993, of which 
75.3 percent went to industrial production and 24.7 percent were 
used to meet local needs.  As compared with the previous years, a 
decline in wood felling has been recorded recently.  This is 
explained by the steps taken for yearly rationing the wood felling 
contingent according to the requirements of industry and of the 
population, while also paying attention to environment protection. 
Provisions for 1994 are also lower than last year's.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 0310 GMT 17 Mar 94 AU) 

   RECORD DEALS AT CONSTANTA COMMODITIES EXCHANGE:  The Maritime and 
Commodities Exchange of Constanta (Romanian Black Sea port) has 
recently reported record deals in only one session:  1.177 billion 
lei (the current official exchange rate of the leu is 1,570 to $1). 
Set up on December 17, 1993, the exchange in Constanta is the second 
of its kind in Romania, after the Romanian Commodities Exchange in 
Bucharest.  The ECONOMISTUL review writes that in the respective 
session a contract of 1,000 tons corn was offered at 150,000 lei/ton 
and sold for 168,000 lei/ton, five contracts of 1,000 tons fodder 
barley each, first bid 170,000 lei/ton, final bid 165,000 lei/ton, a 
contract of 200 Toshiba color television sets was bought for 550,800 
lei apiece, from a first bid of 565,000 lei apiece, and a contract 
of 200 freedom color television sets sold for 369,300 lei apiece, 
from the first bid of 375,000 lei apiece. 

   Exchange President Viorel Marian Pana termed the deals as the 
most important ones in the last few years in Romania.  He said that 
since the exchange was opened, 40 deals were concluded, which 
resulted in contracts worth some 300 million lei on the average per 
session. The bids already made for the next session (for the time 
being, the sessions are being scheduled once a week) show that the 
one billion lei mark will be topped again.  "Together with the 
colleagues of the Bucharest Commodities Exchange, and with other 
colleagues in the country, we plan to draw up some standings of our 
common problems. We try to overcome certain difficulties of a legal 
nature.  We are interested in a law of exchanges to be issued," he 
told the ECONOMISTUL.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0603 GMT 17 Mar 
94 AU) 

   TELECOMMUNICATIONS SECTOR RECORDS GROWTH:  Romanian 
telecommunications have recorded sizable growth in the last four 
years.  The most spectacular drive started in November 1992 with the 
introduction of the new number system all over the country.  The 
second stage of the action will be completed by 25 March 1994 when 
the county digits will change.  The purpose of this great change in 
the telephone system in Romania is to achieve uniformity of numbers, 
first in Bucharest and then in other cities where digital exchanges 
were installed and the automated international system was 
introduced.  There were 2.6 million mainlines in Romania in 1993. 
The number of telephone sets went up to some 3.5 million and the 
rate of telephone penetration reached 11.53 percent.  Likewise, the 
access to international telephone lines has been considerably 
improved since 1990.  Currently, there are 5,880 international 
automated posts and 58 manual lines, as well as 133 satellite 
connections.  The Romanian microwave networks ensure five 
international connections in Bulgaria, former Yugoslavia, Hungary, 
Ukraine, and the Republic of Moldova.  These achievements have been 
facilitated by an EBRD (European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development) loan and cooperation with the Italian Sirti and 
Japanese Tomen companies.  Four joint ventures are currently 
building telephone exchanges in Romania:  Alcatel network system, 
Emcom, Electromagnetica Goldstar and Felix Telecom.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 0335 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   RADIO COMMUNICATIONS SECTOR EXPANDS:  Three new companies emerged 
in the free market of value-added radio communication services in 
1993:  Telefonica Romania SA, providing services of mobile cellular 
radio telephony; Comunicatii Nationale Mobile SA, providing paging 
service; and Societatea 3 TV Timisoara, handling the production and 
broadcasting of television programs. The Radiocommunication National 
Company is directly involved in the setting up of these new 
companies, with stakes of 20 percent, 46 percent and 20 percent, 
respectively, of their total stock. 

   According to the National Program of Communication Development in 
1991-2005, television channel 2 will be extended all over the 
national territory, the cost of the works being estimated at $120 
million.  Another $95 million will be spent on setting up three 
national radio channels to broadcast on ultra short waves and on 
replacing the worn-out equipment operated in the long, medium, and 
short bands.  As regards the telephone services, the company has a 
network covering some 50 percent of the long-distance telephone 
traffic, as well as five international connections with Bulgaria, 
former Yugoslavia, Hungary, Ukraine, and Moldova.  The land stations 
for satellite communications cover 92 percent of the continental 
traffic though the Intelsat stations (for the Atlantic and Indian 
oceans) and 31 percent of the inter-European traffic through the 
Eutelsat station.  All stations are being used both for telephone 
and television services. 

   According to the magazine FLACARA, the conversion of the 
analogous circuits with IDR digital circuits for the Atlantic- 
Intelsat connection has started.  As for the new services, the radio 
communication company plans to approach the sector of cable 
television, develop classical and cellular radio telephony, the 
paging and trunking systems, and the VSAT networks; it also plans to 
introduce numeric television and radio in Romania, and improve the 
performance of the satellite communication equipment.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 0533 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIME MINISTER DISCUSSES PRIVATIZATION:  The pace of 
privatization has been more rapid this year than last year, said 
Prime Minister Nicolae Vacaroiu in an interview with the daily VOCEA 
ROMANIEI.  Two hundred and seventy small- and middle-sized companies 
were privatized last year as against the 140 businesses that passed 
into private ownership in the first two months of this year.  Yet 
the pace has not met our expectations, said the prime minister, who 
mentioned that the "action has to be stepped up."  The Romanian 
prime minister told VOCEA ROMANIEI that his cabinet had referred a 
bill to parliament on transferring ownership to employees grouped in 
associations.  Mr. Vacaroiu also mentioned that the Council for 
Reform had been putting the final touches to a bill favoring rapid 
attraction of the vouchers that have been distributed to the 
population, with which shares would be bought.  Simultaneously, a 
more powerful offensive started with a view to attracting foreign 
investors.  A bill was drafted and forwarded to parliament, added 
the prime minister, on additional opportunities for foreign 
investors, who bring in more than $50 million worth of capital. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1011 GMT 18 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIVATIZATION PROGRAMS IN INDUSTRY:  The Administration Board of 
the State Property Fund, FPS, adopted several decisions aimed at 
speeding up privatization.  The FPS adopted a new list of companies 
proposed for privatization including 203 small-sized units and 71 
middle-sized ones.  The sale of the shares of eleven important 
businesses was endorsed, four big units were given an opportunity to 
choose from among partial sale, leasing, and transfer of assets to 
other companies.  The FPS approved the creation of seven commercial 
companies with private capital, foreign or Romanian.  Several 
studies for the restructuring of commercial companies were endorsed 
in fields considered to be of maximum importance by the Romanian 
Government, such as agriculture, metal processing, and machine 
building.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0521 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   BALKAN BUSINESS COOPERATION CENTER OPENS:  A delegation of the 
Romanian Development Agency (ARD) attended Monday, 21 March, the 
opening in Bucharest of the Romanian branch of the Balkan Center for 
Cooperation Between Small and Medium-Sized Businesses, established 
at Romania's initiative in October 1992 at Varna, Bulgaria. 
Adhering to it were the national bodies in charge of small and 
medium-sized business development policies in Albania, Bulgaria, 
Greece, Romania, and Turkey.  The center has a permanent secretariat 
at the Romanian Development Agency, financed by the Romanian 
Government.  The secretariat has two offices, one in Thessaloniki 
and the other one in Istanbul, to be-inaugurated in March, both 
being sponsored by their host countries.  The Romanian delegation 
attending the opening of the Thessaloniki subsidiary is to discuss 
bilateral relations between ARD and the Hellenic organization for 
small and medium-sized businesses and their joint activities related 
to technical assistance and training.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 
1314 GMT 21 Mar 94 AU) 

   'INTERNATIONAL BANK OF RELIGIONS' OPENS:  Officially inaugurated 
on 1 March 1994 in a modern Bucharest headquarters, the 
International Bank of Religions opened its gates for the public on 
Monday, 21 March 1994.  Initially called the Romanian 
Interconfessional Bank, "the International Bank of Religions aims to 
become the bank of all the faithfuls, the bank of those who pray for 
their daily bread and of the businessmen who are convinced that 
their prosperity is coming also from God," reads a press communique 
released to ROMPRES news agency.  Initiated by the International 
Ecumenical Center, its main founding member operating in Romania 
under the aegis of the UNESCO National Committee, the International 
Bank of Religions launched its public subscription on 25 February 
1993 and has now several hundreds of shareholders among whom 
businessmen from the United States, Africa, the Gulf area etc. 

   A unique bank of its kind in the world, the International Bank of 
Religions aims to become a bridge between good faithfuls all over 
the world, regardless of their religion.  Among the bank's founding 
members are several representatives of all officially recognized 
denominations in Romania.  Besides the support provided for the 
confessional activity of these denominations, the new banking 
institution has a concrete business programme in the oil industry, 
in tourism, in health care, and in education.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in 
English 1200 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   KRUPP EXPERTS DISCUSS DANUBE SHIPPING ISSUES:  A delegation of 
Krupp Hoesch International Managers and Experts is in Constanta 
port, Romania, to discuss problems concerning the shipping on the 
Danube and the operation in Romanian ports.  The talks will cover 
sea shipping and communications, logistics of road, river and air 
transportation, and tourist issues.  At the end of the visit, the 
delegation is expected to sign important documents on cooperation. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1500 GMT 22 Mar 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT TO BOOST IRON, STEEL INDUSTRY:  Governmental bodies 
have drafted programs intended to revive the metal-processing branch 
by fully using production units and reducing the lag in technology 
as compared to developed countries.  This will contribute to the 
revival of the economy as a whole, assess the said bodies.  Designed 
to produce 17 million tons of steel each year, the Romanian iron and 
steel industry registered a continuous drop after 1989, with a low 
in 1992, when merely 5 million tons of steel were manufactured, 
writes the daily VOCEA ROMANIEI.  That was caused, among other 
things, by a drop in production in all the other branches of the 
economy, the severe reduction of investments, financial blockage, 
and inflation.  As for 1993, production in that industry increased 
by 3 percent as compared to the previous year, but it was still 
suffering from the financial blockage. 

   The metal-processing department of the Ministry of Industries has 
elaborated together with research and design institutes a "Study for 
the Restructuring and Modernization of the Iron and Steel Industry 
Over 1994-2002," which was debated and amended during the 25 
February meeting of the government.  Restructuring and modernization 
studies have also been elaborated for the non-ferrous industry and 
the industry of heat-resisting substances.  The adjusting of the 
production capacity to domestic and foreign demand, the use, by at 
least 80 percent, of the production units, a gradual reduction of 
the technology lag compared to developed countries by the revamping 
of huge plants, such as the ones in Galati, Calarasi, and Hunedoara, 
and the launching of privatization in that branch are among the 
priority goals, said Petre Ianc, secretary of state in the Ministry 
of Industries.  "The development and boosting of the metal- 
processing sector can ensure the redressing of the whole Romanian 
economy," added Ianc.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0825 GMT 10 Mar 
94 AU) 

   CUSTOMS HEAD OUTLINES SITUATION ON BORDERS:  The customs system 
in Romania is ensured by 94 units, 37 of which are border crossing 
points belonging to 10 regional departments.  They are run by a 
staff of 4,800, out of which 650 persons work in central 
departments, said Mihai Pinzariu, general director of the Romanian 
Customs Services, who granted an interview to the review BURSA. 
Over 50 percent of the personnel are university graduates, and many 
of them are taking training courses in Romania and in other 
countries, such as the United States, Austria, Great Britain, 
Belgium, and France.  According to Pinzariu, envisaged is the 
setting up of a customs school in Romania.  Referring to the border 
crossing points flow, Pinzariu said that "there is a growing need 
for new border crossing points."  Presently, modernization and 
expansion works are carried out on 42 border crossing points.  At 
Giurgiu, on the Danube River, a first part of the customs unit was 
built with $450,000 worth of U.S. assistance, through the agency of 
UN bodies.  In addition, four more units were opened recently on the 
eastern border, to the Republic of Moldova, and eight on the western 
border of Romania.  Pinzariu also mentioned the fact that for the 
observance of the UN-imposed embargo over Yugoslavia, Romanian 
customs workers received three speedboats from the United States, a 
patrol boat from Great Britain, and over 40 stationary and mobile 
radio-receiver stations.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0939 GMT  11 
Mar 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT EFFORTS TO LURE FOREIGN INVESTORS:  During its Friday, 
11 March, meeting, the executive approved a decision concerning some 
enlightenments granted to foreign investors, intended to increase 
the flow of foreign capital invested in the industrial sector.  The 
companies with participation of foreign capital over $50 million, 
having a 60-percent integration in the Romanian industry and 
exporting more than 50 percent of their production, shall be 
exempted for seven years from tariffs on imports of machine-tools 
and equipment, spare parts, and raw materials necessary for their 
production.  They shall also be exempted for five years from tax on 
profits. 

   The Romanian executive also examined the strategy of reform and 
restructuring in the fields of physical and town planning, public 
works, and building industry.  The latter sector was considered to 
have large possibilities for privatization, as about 30 percent of 
the construction enterprises have been privatized so far, four of 
them being large companies.  While analyzing the present stage and 
the 1994-1995 priorities of the sector of small and middle 
companies, the fact that there are currently 524,000 such private 
companies registered was considered to be relevant.  The government 
adopted a decision setting the minimum gross monthly salary, the 
payment of which is guaranteed by the government, at 60,000 lei per 
month (the official exchange rate of the dollar is $1=1,570 lei.) 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1658 GMT 12 Mar 94 AU) 

   PRIME MINISTER VIEWS 1993 ECONOMIC ACHIEVEMENTS:  The economic 
achievements in 1993 were "satisfactory" with the flattening of the 
production decline as a "partial success," said Romanian Prime 
Minister Nicolae Vacaroiu at a press conference on Monday, March 14, 
where the prime minister briefly assessed the government's activity 
in 1993 and the priorities for the future.  "Our basic concern was 
to speed up the reform and manage Romania's recovery from crisis," 
said the prime minister.  The main achievements of the present 
cabinet were said to be:  the 1-percent growth of the gross domestic 
product; the 1.3-percent increase of industrial production; the 
growth of agricultural production by 12.4 percent; the rise of labor 
productivity per employee by 3.6 percent; a 4-percent growth of 
exports and a 4-percent decrease of imports, all comparisons being 
made to 1992. 

   "Despite the fact that exports increased over the second part of 
1993, the trade balance still showed a deficit," the prime minister 
said.  Romania's foreign debt has remained constant in 1993, as no 
new loans were granted.  Referring to the agriculture as a priority 
sector, Prime Minister Vacaroiu said that its privatization remains 
an essential preoccupation of the executive.  The prime minister 
expressed his concern over the problems facing the animal-breeding 
sector.  Referring to the social issues, Vacaroiu said that despite 
the fact that social protection represented a major concern of the 
executive, 1993 had brought no improvement in the living standard. 
The inflation rate surged as high as 295.5 percent, while salaries 
rose merely by 210 percent.  "For us, 1993 has also meant a sequence 
of difficult, unpopular actions, such as the cut of state subsidies 
or the introduction of the value-added tax," Prime Minister Nicolae 
Vacaroiu said.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1149 GMT 15 Mar 94 AU) 

   STATISTICS BOARD REPORT ON INDUSTRIAL PRODUCTION:  Romania's 
industrial production in January 1994 was 5.5 percent greater than 
last December and 1.8 percent greater than in January 1993, 
announced the National Statistics Board.  Nineteen industrial 
branches reported bigger production than in December.  Sizable rises 
were recorded especially in computing and office equipment (plus 
68.7 percent), metallic construction and products (plus 44.4 
percent), means of road transport (plus 40.8 percent), electric 
machines and apparatus (plus 21.4 percent).  The lowest production 
levels were reported with wireless, television and communication 
sets (minus 61.1 percent), means of transport other than road (minus 
44.7 per cent). 

   Physical production went up over December 1993 with a number of 
important products:  coal, gasoline, sodium products, chemical 
fertilizers, synthetic and man-made yarn and fibers, window glass, 
bearings, refrigerators, electric engines, transformers, city and 
all-terrain cars.  Decreases were reported especially with cement, 
rough steel, tractors, fish, meat, edible oil.  The value of 
production totalled 2,130.1 billion lei, and the deliveries to the 
home and foreign markets were worth 2,055 billion lei, which made 
the stocks of finished goods with producers grow during the month, 
reaching 1,417.9 billion lei, i.e. 66.6 percent of January's 
production, as compared with 64.9 percent last December.  The value 
of contracts and orders concluded by economic operators in the 
processing industry last January totalled 7,944.0 billion lei, so 
that by 31 January they were worth 8,390.3 billion lei. 

   At the end of January industry had 2,543,5000 employees, by 
19,500 less than at the end of last December.  The work time in 
January was used 83.8 percent (as compared with 79.7 percent the 
month before and 83.2 percent in January 1993).  The level of hourly 
labor productivity in January was 5.5 percent higher than in January 
1993, but 4.5 percent lower than in December 1993.  Labor 
productivity per employee was better (in comparable conditions in 
point of number of work days), topping by 1.5 percent the level of 
December 1993 and by 5.9 percent that of January 1993.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 0919 GMT 3 Mar 94 AU) 

   ECONOMIC TIES WITH SOUTH AMERICA:  Romanian Commerce Minister 
Cristian Ionescu told daily VOCEA ROMANIEI with reference to the 
results of his recent tour of Brazil, Venezuela and Colombia, that a 
salient feature he noted was "the three countries' interest in using 
the facilities offered by Romanian industries, especially the 
petrochemistry and iron-and-steel industry.  The wish was expressed 
to process large amounts of oil from those countries in refining 
units in Romania, with payment either in products resulting from 
processing or in cash."  Mentioning that both Venezuela and Brazil 
were Romania's traditional iron ore suppliers, the minister outlined 
Romania's readiness to accept investments in that domain and also 
the participation of foreign partners as stockholders of big 
Romanian iron-and-steel combines.  The idea was also discussed that 
the ore should be processed into products with safe outlets in 
Europe, maybe by joint marketing. 

   The Romanian minister showed that in Venezuela export contracts 
were concluded for the following products:  machine-tools ($1.3 
million), tractors (300,000), ARO all-terrain cars (2.5 million), 
coaches and buses to be assembled on the spot.  As for Colombia, a 
protocol was signed on the commissioning of an ARO car assembly 
line, worth some $26 million this year.  In Brazil, a new trade 
agreement was signed, that gives purely commercial bases to the 
economic relations, eliminating the clearing pattern.  The Brazilian 
partners are extremely interested in buying ARO all-terrain cars, 
buses, trucks and concrete forms of collaboration are to be 
established soon.  The minister also recalled the wish of the Bank 
of Brazil, the biggest in South America, to open a branch in 
Bucharest.  All three countries visited showed great interest in 
opening an airline between South America and Romania, that would 
cover also Central and Eastern Europe and would allow for two-way 
flow of businessmen.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1430 GMT 3 Mar 
94 AU) 

   DESTRUCTION OF IRRIGATION SYSTEM HURTS CROP YIELDS:  Experts of 
the Romanian Ministry of Agriculture and Food Industry have proposed 
that some 2.1 million hectares be irrigated in 1994 out of the 
3,101.743 hectares of appropriately laid-out land.  A "ministry of 
irrigation" was also proposed to be founded in order to manage the 
re-actuation of the irrigation system.  More than two-thirds of the 
land to be irrigated in case of drought conditions, according to the 
ministry plans, is held by private farmers.  The most troubled zone 
includes the southern counties affected for over 10 years by a 
severe drought with temperatures over 40 degrees centigrade in 
summer.  The tree veils protecting communication roads and river 
beds have vanished and the irrigation utilities devastated, 
mistakenly taken as communist vestiges.  Under these circumstances, 
the agricultural product has fallen dramatically.  "Production has 
fallen from 4.5 tons of wheat and 10 tons of corn per hectare of 
previously irrigated land to 1.9 tons and 3.0 tons respectively, 
said a village mayor of Calarasi County, cited by the daily CURIERUL 
NATIONAL.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1826 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   BOEING-ROMAERO COOPERATION PROTOCOL:  The Romanian firm ROMAERO 
and the U.S. firm Boeing signed a protocol of bilateral cooperation 
in Bucharest, March 5.  "It is no secret that we want to become 
major under-contractors of the American firm that manufactures more 
than 60 percent of the world aircraft production," said engineer 
Tudorel Dumitrascu, director of the ROMAERO at the signing ceremony. 
According to the 8-year contract -- which can be prolonged -- the 
Romanian party will build parts and subassemblies for Boeing 737 and 
Boeing 757 (trailing edges, landing gear).  Larry Warfield, 
representative of the firm Boeing for Romania and Dorin Dumitriu, 
head of the direction for restructuring of the State Ownership Fund 
attended the signing ceremony.  The cooperation is expected to stop 
the decline of the aircraft industry and to attract foreign 
investors, said the persons who took the floor.  "We think that the 
restructuring of the plant has been completed and all conditions 
have been put in place for the company to secure profits, said 
ROMAERO director Tudorel Dumitrascu.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 
1850 GMT 4 Mar 94 AU) 

   KOREAN CREDIT FOR TELECOMMUNICATIONS MODERNIZATION:  A credit 
contract worth $50 million was signed Friday, 4 March at Bucharest 
between Eximbank of the Republic of Korea and Telecom, the Romanian 
Telecommunications Corporation, for the modernization of the 
latter's network in the County of Prahova.  The Korean Government's 
credit has been granted in terms of an advantageous 4.2 percent 
annual interest, a five-year period of grace and reimbursement 
scheduled for 20 years," Telecommunications Minister Andrei Chirica 
told ROMPRES at the signing ceremony.  The money will be used by 
Telecom to buy equipment for Prahova's telecommunications, a project 
estimated to be completed in 36 months and to consist of the 
installation of 100,000 digital telephone lines in some 80 of the 
county's communities.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1553 GMT 5 Mar 
94 AU) 

   VIENNA TRADE FAIR IN BUCHAREST:  The well-known Vienna Trade Fair 
(IFABO), held for the first time in Bucharest under the organization 
of Romexpo and the Wiener Messen und Congress of Austria has been 
entered by 50 firms specializing in computers, communications and 
office equipment from Romania, Austria, Denmark, France, Germany, 
Italy, Great Britain, the United States of America and others.  The 
organizers and the participants alike are sure that the IFABO 1994 
will be successful and that it will contribute to boost the 
commercial exchanges of Romanian economic units. 

   Guenther Hickl, director-general of the organizing firm, said 
that the IFABO was first held in Vienna in 1970, and that it had 
been held in the past years in Budapest and Prague.  "The Romanian 
market is still at the beginning of a phase characterized by 
mounting interest from economic units in computerization, 
telecommunications and office equipment.  According to estimates, 
the computers to be installed the country in the next two years will 
double the present number.  I should like to say that Romanians are 
very clever, very good technicians, that they can readily become 
accustomed to the new technologies.  That is an important national 
resource to boast of.  We shall be very content to turn this first 
IFABO into the starting point of many mutually advantageous trade 
and partnership contacts," said Hickl.  Speaking about this first 
holding of IFABO-Bucharest, Berry van den Hoven, director-general 
for Eastern Europe of the Alcatel Business Systems Austria, 
mentioned:  "I think that it will be a promising start, first of all 
for Romanian businessmen, who have an opportunity to become informed 
on the situation on the international market as far as computers, 
communications and office equipment are concerned."  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 1705 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   AGREEMENT WITH GERMANY ON BUCHAREST WHOLESALE MARKET:  Romania 
and Germany signed on 8 March in Bucharest an agreement between the 
two governments on a bilateral project for the building of the 
biggest farm foodstuff sales center.  Under the agreement, the 
German party will give free technical assistance in the 
implementation of the project that benefits a loan given by the 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development.  The Bucharest 
wholesales market for fruit and vegetables will be built in the zone 
of Popesti-Leordeni over 30 hectares.  The building will start in 
mid-1996 and will be completed in two years.  The project is 
estimated to cost $35 million, 25 million of which will be given by 
the EBRD.  the wholesale market is organized upon the system of 
share-holding companies.  The Romanian party will cover its part of 
the expenses by selling stock to home and foreign investors. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1503 GMT 8 Mar 94 AU) 

   DROP OF INFLATION VIEWED AS POSITIVE SIGN:  Commenting on the 
January 1994 cut on inflation, the daily COTIDIANUL regards it as an 
optimistic sign but only in the short term, for control over 
inflationist pressure should be exercised by speeding up the process 
of privatization and restructuring.  According to the head of the 
IMF mission, Maxwell Watson, one success in the process of reform is 
that scored over "the monster of inflation," the daily writes.  For 
the monster had to return to its den.  Its force has subsided from 
14 percent in November 1993 to five percent in January 1994.  Is it 
good, or bad?  This is the question raised by the people, by 
economic agents and even by our master, the state. 

   In 1993, "the monster" of inflation was the worst thing of all. 
Its "spewed fire" devastated the population's savings, profits (for 
those who managed to make them), incomes and banking capital, 
investment sources, etc.  But worst of all was that inflation 
weakened the social cohesion of the nation.  Inflation in Romania 
had erupted after the elimination of subsidies to several basic 
goods, the introduction of the value added tax and liberalization of 
the mark-up.  The most recent "corrections" were made to the prices 
for pork and chicken meat, after "pressures" put by farm units 
threatened with bankruptcy.  The persisting effects of inflation 
over 1991-1993 have steadily lowered and eroded confidence in the 
national currency, the daily adds.  Through the measures taken by 
banks to attract money deposits promoting interests between 100 and 
130 percent and under the circumstances of reduced inflation, one 
can hope in the revival of the investment process. 

   In conclusion, the daily COTIDIANUL remarks:  "The positive signs 
regarding inflation are optimistic only in the short term, for the 
phenomenon must be correlated with price evolutions, the offer, the 
exchange rate, with the ratio between circulating assets and fixed 
assets (re-capitalization).  And all these can be controlled only by 
speeding up the process of privatization and restructuring.  So, it 
is useless for the National Bank to initiate and announce new anti- 
inflation programs, if they do not match the real economy." 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0852 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   INTERNATIONAL TRADE FAIRS, SHOWS ORGANIZED BY ROMEXPO:  "The year 
1993 was a special year.  The success of the 19th Bucharest 
International Fair TIB confirmed our company's seriousness and 
maturity," said George Cojocaru, director-general of the ROMEXPO to 
the government daily VOCEA ROMANIEI.  "This is proved also by our 
admission with full rights to the Union des Foires Internationales 
based in Paris, along with 159 other members, to the most 
prestigious organizers of fairs and shows of 63 countries". 
ROMEXPO's name, he added, is not associated only with the TIB or the 
TIBCO (the International Consumer Goods Fair).  "We also pay 
attention to the diversification of the themes of specialized shows. 
ROMEXPO, under the aegis of its major stockholder -- the Chamber of 
Commerce and Industry of Romania -- facilitated the organization of 
the official participation of 369 Romanian companies in 26 
international events, including those in London, Paris, Hanover, 
Leipzig, Tokyo, Cairo, Buenos Aires, general fairs, and also in 
technical or consumer goods fairs. 

   Cojocaru said that apart from the international fair of 
computers, communication and office technique IFABO, held at the 
beginning of March in Bucharest, this month will see also the 
organization of the "Construct Expo," an international show of 
building and construction technologies.  An international show of 
sports gear "Sports" will be held next June.  There will be another 
12 international fairs and shows as well, including:  BITME, the 
textile machinery show; the group of medical shows -- Rommedica, 
Rompharma, Romcontrola, Romdent; a Metallurgical Technology show -- 
EXPOMET; a fair of furniture, glassware, ceramics -- BIFE; a show of 
hotel and restaurant furniture -- Romhotel, a car salon, Bims, a 
computing technique show Cerf, organized by the American Comtec 
Company and the Computerland Company of Romania.  (Bucharest ROMPRES 
in English  0902 GMT 9 Mar 94 AU) 

   SLOVAKIA 

   JANUARY PRODUCTION RESULTS:  The volume of industrial production 
in January 1994 was 1.2 percent lower than in December 1993 but 4.5 
percent higher than in January 1993, the Slovak Statistical Office 
(SSU) announced.  According to SSU Chairman Rudolf Krc, this is the 
first increase in industrial production, compared with the same 
month the year before, since the start of economic reform.  The 
increase was achieved due to an increase in labor productivity, 
which is another positive factor, Krc said.  The volume of 
construction work, on the other hand, was 1.2 percent lower than in 
January 1993.  (Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 15 Mar 94 pp 1,2; 
Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 15 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   NUMBER, STRUCTURE OF BUSINESSES:  A total of 28,972 "economic 
entities" entered in the company register operated in Slovakia at 
the end of January 1994, 26,156 of which belonged to the private 
sector (including cooperatives, joint ventures, and foreign-owned 
firms) and 1,936 were in "public ownership."  Compared with December 
1993, the number of private firms increased by 442, while the number 
of firms in public ownership declined by 452.  The Slovak 
Statistical Office registered 283,300 private entrepreneurs at the 
end of January; their number remained virtually unchanged compared 
with December 1993.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 15 Mar 94 p 2 
AU) 

   LIVESTOCK NUMBERS:  Livestock numbers in Slovakia continue to 
decline as a result of the restrictive policy of the last few years. 
A total of 976,400 heads of cattle, 2,159,400 pigs, and 425,700 
sheep are being bred in Slovakia at present.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA 
in Slovak 15 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   ROLLER BEARING PLANT 'IN DEATH THROES':  The ZVL (Roller Bearing 
Plant) Kysucke Nove Mesto a.s., which is "in death throes," has 
changed hands.  As of 1 March 1994, the company has been transferred 
to the administration of the ZVL-KLF AS, the only firm that has met 
the conditions of a public tender organized by ZVL's creditor banks. 
This largest factory in the Kysuce area now employs only 2,100 of 
its original work force of over 6,000; another 746 employees are to 
be laid off as of 1 May.  The company's credit burden exceeds the 
sum of 2.3 billion Slovak korunas (Sk).  (Bratislava SLOVENSKY 
DENNIK in Slovak 15 Mar 94 p 2; Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 15 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   DEFICIT IN TRADE WITH CZECH REPUBLIC DECLINES:  According to 
Martin Svehla, spokesman for the Czech National Bank, the Slovak 
deficit on the clearing account that records the balance of payments 
between the Czech and Slovak Republics is declining.  This is due to 
a reduction in payments from Slovakia to the Czech Republic.  The 
volume of payments from the Czech Republic to Slovakia, on the other 
hand, remains roughly at the previous level, Svehla told the 
economic daily HOSPODARSKE NOVINY.  The deficit on the "old 
account," which records payments for transactions carried out prior 
to the currency split of 8 February 1993, amounts to less than 0.5 
billion Czech korunas (Kc), while the deficit on the "new account," 
for transactions carried out after 8 February 1993, has dropped to 
approximately 96 million European Currency Units (ECUs), which is 
over Kc3 billion.  Altogether, the Slovak deficit amounts to 
approximately Kc3.6 billion.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 15 Mar 94 pp 1, 2 AU) 

   MINERS ON FORCED LEAVE:  The 2,500 employees of the Cigel Mine 
near Prievidza will each be compelled to take 10 days of annual 
leave in March and April.  This was decided by the company's 
management, following an agreement with the trade union 
organization, in view of the low volume of deliveries to the Novaky 
power station and smaller customers.  The mine has extracted 160,000 
tons of coal since the beginning of the year, of which 34,000 tons 
have had to be placed on an "emergency dump" where there is a danger 
of oxidation and subsequent self-ignition.  New extraction has 
therefore had to be scaled down.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 17 Mar 94 p 2 AU)  The 1,500 employees of the Dolina Mine in 
Velky Krtis had to take "extraordinary leave" in the second week of 
March because the capacity of the dumps has been exceeded.  The main 
customer, the Novaky power station, will purchase in the first three 
months of this year 42,000 fewer tons of coal from the Velky Krtis 
mine than it had ordered.  Miners' organizations blame the situation 
on the import of cheaper Czech, Polish, and Ukrainian coal and 
demand "measures to protect the domestic market." (Bratislava 
NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 18 Mar 94 p 22 AU) 

   CONTRACT ON APARTMENTS FOR RUSSIA:  A contract for the 
construction of over 1,000 apartments in Voronezh in the Russian 
Federation has been signed by a consortium of Banska Bystrica 
building companies, including Stavex and the Banska Bystrica Civil 
Engineering Works.  The project, which is worth Sk1.1 billion, is 
financed by the German Government.  The construction of the 
apartments, which are intended for Russian soldiers returning from 
Germany, will take 13 months and more than 1,000 builders from 
Slovakia will participate in the project.  While the main building 
materials will come from local sources, special materials and steel 
will have to be transported to Voronezh by truck, of which there 
will be about 1,200.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 17 
Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   DATA ON DEPOSITS, CREDITS:  According to the latest Slovak 
National Bank (NBS) data on monetary development in the Slovak 
Republic, koruna deposits of both businesses and the population 
reached Sk208.3 billion by the end of 1993.  Foreign currency 
deposits amounted to the equivalent of Sk29.5 billion at the end of 
the year.  By the end of last year, banks had provided Sk264.7 
billion in credit to businesses and households, of which Sk260.6 
billion were koruna credits.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 21 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   'POSITIVE TURNABOUT' IN PAYMENTS WITH CZECH REPUBLIC:  A 
"positive turnabout" in the development of payments between the 
Slovak Republic and the Czech Republic occurred in March, according 
to Ivan Paska, head of the Slovak National Bank Press Department. 
The Slovak Republic's deficit on the clearing account, which stood 
at over 136 million clearing ECU on 1 March, dropped to under 109 
million clearing ECU (5.031 billion Slovak korunas) by 7 March. 
This falls 21 million clearing ECU short of the "marginal credit" of 
130 million ECU laid down in the agreement on payments between the 
two republics.  Sums exceeding the "marginal credit" must be 
defrayed in hard currency.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 9 Mar 94 
p 3 AU) 

   AUSTRIAN FIRM IN JOINT VENTURE:  One of the latest activities of 
the Slovak National Agency for Foreign Investments and Development 
(SNAZIR) is the establishment of a joint venture between the 
Austrian firm Roehring Neudorf and Plasmet Vrable.  The joint 
venture, whose production program consists of plastics components, 
will create approximately 50 jobs by the end of 1994.  In the 
future, the number of employees should double.  The Austrian partner 
pledged to invest 45.5 million Slovak korunas (Sk) in the venture, 
SNAZIR Director General Jozef Cernak announced.  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 10 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   STATE OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS:  Although Slovak Telecommunications 
put into operation the record number of 72,000 telephones in 1993 
(in the past, this used to be the volume realized in an entire five- 
year planning period), the number of pending applications for a 
telephone further increased last year.  The number of telephones in 
Slovakia increased from 820,882 at the end of 1992 to 892,766 at the 
end of 1993, which represents an 8.8 percent increase.  Of the 
892,766 telephones installed, 662,179 are in households.  In the 
same year, the number of pending applications for a telephone 
increased from 159,042 to 166,498 -- that is, by 4.7 percent.  Only 
in the capital of Bratislava, which is "slowly reaching a decent 
European average" in the number of telephones per 100 households, 
did the number of pending applications drop:  from 22,500 at the end 
of 1992 to 17,600 at the end of 1993.  Despite the continuing 
expansion of the digital network (a new modern digital telephone 
exchange has just been opened in Zilina), the complete transition to 
digital technology can be expected only after the year 2000. 
(Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 9 Mar 94 pp 1, 2; 
Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 11 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT FOR TURKMENISTAN:  In Stropkov "this 
week," representatives of Tesla Stropkov AS and Turkmenistan 
Communications signed a contract worth $995,000 for the supply of 
telecommunications equipment to Turkmenistan.  During the talks, 
they also prepared documentation for the establishment of a joint 
venture to be based in Askhabad.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 11 Mar 94 p 2; Bratislava SME in Slovak 12 Mar 94 p 3 AU) 

   HOECHST-BIOTIKA DIVERSIFIES PRODUCTION:  New production equipment 
worth more than 6.3 million German marks was put into operation in 
the Hoechst-Biotika Ltd. company in Martin, central Slovakia, on 10 
March, in the presence of Heike Zenker, FRG ambassador to Slovakia. 
Hoechst-Biotika is a joint venture formed by the Hoechst AG from 
Frankfurt am Main, Germany, and Biotika Slovenska Lupca in 1992. 
The German partner has a 52 percent stake in the venture.  The joint 
venture, which employs approximately 300 people in its Martin plant, 
has been producing only drugs in the form of ampules thus far. 
Following the installation of the new equipment, it will start 
producing pills, lotions, and ointments as well.  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 11 Mar 94 p 2; Bratislava PRAVDA in 
Slovak 11 Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   Biotika Slovenska Lupca, the parent company, was one of the most 
profitable Slovak companies in 1993.  It achieved a profit of Sk163 
million on a turnover of Sk1.2 billion.  It employs 2,900 people, 
including subsidiaries, whose average monthly wages of Sk7,100 are 
well above the Slovak average.  The company exports 60 percent of 
its output to 15 countries and demand for its products greatly 
exceeds supply.  The main export commodities are penicillin and 
chlortetracycline.  The share price of Biotika Slovenska Lupca went 
up from Sk600 in the second half of 1993 to about Sk3,000 at 
present.  More than 40 percent of its stock remains, however, in the 
possession of the National Property Fund of the Slovak Republic. 
(Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 14 Mar 94 p 7; Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 14 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   PRINCIPLES FOR SALE OF CITY-OWNED APARTMENTS:  At its meeting on 
11 March, the City Council in Kosice, Slovakia's second largest 
city, approved principles for the sale of community-owned apartments 
to tenants.  The maximum price of apartments, and the plots 
belonging to them, will be Sk200 per square meter.  The tenants' 
motivation should be stimulated by the decision to reduce the price 
50 percent if all tenants of an apartment bloc decide to purchase 
their apartments.  A price reduction of 25 percent will be granted 
if more than 50 percent of all tenants decide to purchase their 
apartment.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 14 Mar 94 p 12 AU) 

   AUTOMOBILE COMPANY CHANGES NAME:  The general meeting of 
shareholders of the VAB automobile company, based at Banovce nad 
Bebravou, decided to change the company's name to Tatra Sipox AS. 
Besides manufacturing small utility vehicles equipped with 
Lombardini LDW 903 engines, the company produces and sells axles, 
winches, flat beds and boxes, and other components for trucks and 
other vehicles.  (Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 12 Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   GENERAL OVERHAUL OF NUCLEAR PLANT UNIT:  The first unit of the V- 
1 nuclear power plant at Jaslovske Bohunice was taken out of 
operation on 12 March due to a general overhaul.  In the course of 
the general overhaul, which will last until 24 April, planned 
inspections and revisions of the unit's equipment will be carried 
out and "some other work designed to make the power plant 
seismically more resistant will be completed."  (Bratislava SMENA in 
Slovak 14 Mar 94 p 5 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENT DOWN IN 1993:  Foreign investment in the 
Slovak Republic amounted to $135 million in 1993, compared with $151 
million in 1992, prior to Slovakia's independence.  Since the 
political changes of 1989, foreigners have invested a total of $366 
million in Slovakia.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 14 
Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   DUBNICA FIRM TO DELIVER DEMOLITION HAMMERS TO MOSCOW:  The Heavy 
Engineering Plants in Dubnica nad Vahom will deliver six hydraulic 
demolition hammers to Russia in March.  They will be used to remove 
the remains of the buildings destroyed during the coup attempt last 
October.  The Dubnica engineers have also signed a contract to 
supply 20 of these hammers to Ukraine.  Most interest in these 
hammers comes from the Czech Republic.  Almost 90 percent of the 
hammers manufactured in Dubnica are exported there.  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 7 Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   IMPORTS INCREASED 15.4 PERCENT IN 1993:  The Slovak Republic 
exported goods worth 167.2 billion korunas (Sk) in 1993.  The 
largest amount, 41.9 percent, was exported to the Czech Republic. 
This was followed by Germany with 15.3 percent, Austria with 5.0 
percent, and Russia with 4.7 percent.  Overall exports declined by 
11.2 percent.  On the other hand, Slovak imports increased by 15.4 
percent to Sk193.9 billion.  Most imports came from the Czech 
Republic (35.5 percent), Russia (19.6 percent), Germany (11.7 
percent), and Austria (6.4 percent).  The balance of trade was in 
the red by Sk26.7 billion.  However, trade with the Czech Republic 
was in the black by Sk1.3 billion.  Inflation rose to 23.2 percent 
and the average monthly wage was Sk5,372.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY BURZOVE NOVINY in Slovak 7 Mar 94 p 1 AU) 

   LACK OF FUNDS FORCES PLANT TO FURLOUGH WORKERS:  A lack of funds 
to purchase material and spare parts means that almost 2,000 
employees of the Vrutky Railroad Repair and Engineering Plants had 
to take a week's leave beginning on 7 March.  Officials from the 
Slovak Republic Railroads, which owes the plants more than Sk881 
million, have promised to pay the debt within a week.  (Bratislava 
SME in Slovak 8 Mar 94 p 3 AU) 
   SMALL, MEDIUM-SIZED PRIVATE ENTERPRISE INCREASING:  More than 
26,000 private businesses were registered in the republic at the end 
of January.  They include both domestic and foreign companies. 
Their number has increased by 440, that is, by 1.7 percent, since 
December 1993.  Only a 0.1 percent increase in the number of 
business licenses issued has been recorded.  At the end of January, 
283,300 had been issued in the republic.  The influence of small and 
medium-sized enterprise on overall output is increasing.  It was 8.0 
percent in industry and 9.8 percent in construction.  However, it 
accounted for almost 70 percent of the overall volume of retail 
sales.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 8 Mar 94 p 14 AU); 

   FOREIGN CURRENCY RESERVES INCREASING GRADUALLY:  According to 
Slovak National Bank (NBS) Governor Vladimir Masar, the foreign 
currency reserves are increasing gradually, despite payments. 
Overall foreign currency reserves in Slovakia amount to $1.836 
billion.  The reserves in the NBS, without gold, amount to $380 
million.  (Bratislava SLOVENSKY DENNIK in Slovak 8 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   TRADE WITH GERMANY DECLINED 1.1 PERCENT IN 1993:  Slovakia's 
imports from Germany last year amounted to Sk22.3 billion, which was 
11.6 percent of the republic's overall imports.  The republic's 
exports to Germany amounted to Sk25.4 billion, which was 15.2 
percent of overall exports.  However, compared with 1992, the volume 
of mutual trade was 1.1 percent lower.  German capital amounting to 
Sk2.15 billion has been invested in 685 Slovak firms.  (Bratislava 
NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 8 Mar 94 p 7 AU) 

   CONSUMER PRICES INCREASE IN JANUARY:  The consumer prices of 
goods and services in January rose by an average of 1.4 percent 
compared with December 1993.  The cost of foodstuffs increased by 
1.2 percent; egg prices increased most (by 14.9 percent), followed 
by fats (3.0 percent) and milk products (2.0 percent).  Prices for 
non-foodstuffs increased by an average 1.3 percent in the majority 
of monitored categories.  The cost of cultural goods rose by 8.5 
percent due to the higher prices for newspapers and magazines.  The 
cost of services rose by 1.7 percent.  (Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 8 
Mar 94 p 4 AU) 

ELAG/12 April/ECONF/East Europe Division/CL 12/1701Z APR 

